To be entered to win, please visit Natasha's blog and leave a sweet comment for her. Then come back here and leave a comment below letting me know! Be sure to leave a way to contact you if you win.
I love your Squares Isolde, and thanks so much for your continued support with SIBOL. Thank you!
What is especially interesting about this result is that, as you will see, you find ‘Your Card’ by taking a quiz (not an app… no ads… no permissions required). However, my card for this year (using a numerological formula laid out in Mary K. Greer’s books) is (Yes. You guessed it.) The Hanged Man. Spirit is alive and well and living in everything!
A regular romance story is always fun to read but Dodd creates this romance series, the Governess Brides, to be fun yes but with more frustration. The first book sets the tone and the second one continues.
$30; tickets sold in advance (contact your favorite Uncle Billy at 512.476.0100)
A woman is someone who has to be understanding – when the man she is with thinks that motorcycle (or golf, or bars) is the only means of relaxation.
Umami likes his chances, but, then, Umami likes his chances!
- You cannot have children of your own
Finally, of course, unemployment and begging brings to hostel dwellers the derision of the World - those who are marked by addictions - even former addictions - are considered to be 'scum' by many. Therefore they are humbled and take the lowest place in society - and humility is, of course, what all religious are seeking.
"I see you have treated the ends of these anodes, doctor," observed Manoras, examining the machine that Murphy was trundling toward the covered pile of glistening metal sheets. They appear not to be, yet I am conscious of a visual impression of some sort of matter. The impression is extremely vague and uncertain."
“Take heed child you will not need such an excuse here.” a warm voice called out to her.
Spend some time contemplating the gift that is you. Look at the aspects of your personality and your responses to events, situations and people, see them with the eyes of love (not self judgment) as the angels see you. Ask us for assistance to open your heart and it will open. Converse with us to find your clarity and solutions that can assist you in having a more joy-filled adventure.
for the tumbled gold between my teeth,
3. Comic Book Words!
Queen’s House itself will be a “VIP Centre” for the Great and Good of the Olympics.
They decide to see what they can of Burlington, and go to a local necking area that's being patrolled by the police. In the bushes, they're caught by some cops who ask for William's driver's license. Observing his strange gesture of searching his pockets only to realize it's not their (William has forgotten his license was revoked long ago), the cops assume he lost it in the bushes. The cops try to help him find it, but find nothing; shrugging, they suggest he go back to the station to see if they've got it there, and then warn him and Jane to be on their way.
CRUMBLE remaining bar mixture over jam filling
The 70 year-old Chinese man who hand-carved over 6,000 stairs up a mountain for his 80 year-old wife has passed away in the cave which has been the couple’s home for the last 50 years. Over 50 years ago, Liu Guojiang a 19 year-old boy, fell in love with a 29 year-old widowed mother named Xu Chaoqin.
Sometimes I even liked working with the public - usually on a quiet evening when there was time to talk to customers, find out what they liked and make recommendations. Seeing people enjoy the shop, relaxing in an armchair with a book from a new display I'd created was very rewarding.
Fourth Category: “Knowledge and Opinion.” You know something when you believe something to be true, you have a reason to believe it is true, and it is true. You could teach a child that 2+2=5…but they couldn’t know that 2+2=5 because it’s not true…similarly a child can repeat the phrase 2+2=4 but until they understand why that is, they don’t have knowledge. Without reason and truth it is merely opinion. And in common usage of the term knowledge we can know things we have evidence and reason for even if we don’t know it in the same way with the same absolute certainty of arithmetic. For instance, I know that capitalism within a Classically Liberal society is better than any other system yet conceived, and I have mountain of evidence, logic and reason to back this up…although if you wanted to be really strict it is merely highly justified opinion…but for the common philosophic usage of the word, I know this for a fact. I’m guessing again this seems pretty obvious…but let me introduce you to David Hume who thinks you can’t know anything beyond math and since nothing can be known you can’t even really have justified opinions and thus all ideas are equally unfounded…oh there’s Immanuel Kant who tried to get around this by filling our mind with an out of the box operating system he calls a priori knowledge. Adler takes several pages to really dig into the stupidity of Kant’s lacking understanding of how we know things, but let me share with you my favorite passage from the whole book:
In the end, this is exactly what I was looking for and what I expected - that's definitely the recipe I'll make again. I might try it with fresh litchi though, to see how it affects the taste, using 450g of fresh stoned litchis and a homemade syrup (just water and sugar) instead of the canned litchis in syrup. If you try it, let me know..
I’m getting there, but for now, I’ll just take it a day at a time.
The trend kicked off about five years ago, but songs celebrating rum — or “celebrating” rum — continue to crop up on the island, with a couple of new songs released for the current carnival season. Here are some of the lyrics, which I don’t think will be licensed anytime soon by major spirits corporations for use in advertising campaigns:
Spotless, new equipment, physical therapist on duty at all times. It will be perfect for me before and after my knee replacement...and when Gary drives me down, he can work out while he is waiting.
Throughout my entire teenage and college life, I found myself in quasi-serious relationships. I'm a romantic at heart and the white-picket-fence-babies-minivan mantra was (and is!) what most southern women want whether they would ever admit it or not.
Oh. And, I went to the gym two days in a row this week. I can't feel my back. Please send chocolate.
Anyway you can head on over and have a look - the segment runs around 4 minutes. Personally, I'm pleased that the Romance genre has gotten some GOOD press.
– Don’t assume that an associate is on commission, (most are not) and is trying to sell you something to earn more. Most do have a daily sales goal to meet, and it can reach four figures.
encompass
Bubba was fixing a door and he found that he needed a new hinge, so he sent Mary Louise to the hardware store. At the hardware store Mary Louise saw a beautiful teapot on a top shelf while she was waiting for Joe Bob to finish waiting on a customer.
-In time we hate that which we often fear.
Happy Wednesday.
Judy Wise
I haven't really tracked my mileage before, but I think as a good goal to replace the monthly event goal is to include monthy/yearly mileage goals.
Not for time…
We whizz round in record time, that is the joy of shopping with a boy, he will accept any clothes that fit him in the first shop you find. Whilst we are in Debenhams I see a Virgin travel agency so I think while we are waiting for the others we will go and get a quote for our Easter trip to Florida. I haven't used a travel agent since 1998, I source flights and accomodation myself but I think I'll just get a quote, they may be able to get me a better deal.
some other hair on it. In addition, we have also held throughout the
1. Succession planning and his reputation: RB – “The company must be set up so it can continue without me.””
Thank you for the encouragement. Sometimes that's all I need. Isn't that all anyone needs?
Talk to you later!
72 rue bonparte near st. Supliee (nice stores on street)
If your service is something a variety of local folks enjoy, such as a gas station or a hospital, you’re in luck. Those types of industries do not need to be as specific in who they seek out, and so absorbing the following of @ColoSpringsNews or @GrouponDenver will be just dandy.
Strengths: Weakness:
The only sad thing about BV&T is that the service is a little slow. On a busy night you might sometimes be left wondering where the rest of your mains have disappeared to, or be waiting a while on a much needed vodka. The place has everything else in spades, it would be a shame to forego your trip here because of this.
To review the history, the way this preferential upzoning, an example of spot zoning, even got on the table all had to do the community previously being told to expect an improved St. Vincent’s Hospital in return for the sacrifice of accepting it. It’s complicated but, essentially, the old St. Vincent’s Hospital was participating in a manipulation to leverage its nonprofit or 501(c)(3) status into the creation of extra real estate rights (density and zoning override) for the benefit of a private real estate developer looking to build a very large project on some of the city’s most valuable real estate.
My photos of the trees were mostly taken, unfortunately, during the full exposure of the sun... how I would love to be there upon the grounds at 8 a.m. and 8 p.m.!
Every time I come across a recipe from our beloved Aunt Ida, I know it is a good one. She has yet to let us down, even though many folks have forgotten of her, bless her heart. So when I came across this recipe a while back found in Aunt Ida's notes, I knew that if she loved it, we would adore it too.
One of the keepers of the Bear Tower once told me that there is no animal so dangerous or so savage and unmanageable as the hybrid resulting when a fighting dog mounts a she-wolf. We are accustomed to think of the beasts of the forest and mountain as wild, and to think of the men who spring up, as it seems, from their soil as savage. But the truth is that there is a wildness more vicious (as we would know better if we were not so habituated to it) in certain domestic animals, despite their understanding so much human speech and sometimes even speaking a few words; and there is a more profound savagery in men and women whose ancestors have lived in cities and towns since the dawn of humanity. Vodalus, in whose veins flowed the undefiled blood of a thousand exultants - exarchs, ethnarchs, and starosts - was capable of violence unimaginable to the autochthons that stalked the streets of Thrax, naked beneath their huanaco cloaks.
Are you curious about this Hello Baby family? Let me give you their picture and some information about them.
It does not get any simpler than this. We are told to love one another and that is what today is all about. Loving each other.
Yehudit Barsky, director of AJC’s Division on Middle East and International Terrorism was also on hand, speaking about recent threats to the Jewish community, when two parcels containing bombs were recently intercepted in Dubai and Britain, with addresses earmarked for synagogues in Chicago. She noted that the media gave short shrift to fact that both targets were against Jews, with news reports downplaying the anti-Semitic intent of those behind the attempted terror attacks. Barsky, who is fluent in Arabic, described the work her division does around the clock, monitoring publications and websites of extremist groups like the ones behind the failed parcel bombs. While in Seattle, she met with the FBI and local police intelligence to discuss the growing risks posed by such terrorist organizations, particularly against Jewish targets.
Erin McDaid
Yeah. And my body says thanks too.
Sigh. Okay.
There is a software issue around battery life.
No one wants to be told to think more and that getting rid of anger is only to make a mistake in the opposite direction. That type of advice doesn’t sell many books to the lowest common denominator or to what’s worst in us.
Sincerely:
That'll be all for now
Carter: (Laugh). Well I think so too. And he was very practical about it. You know, he kind of would bring it down to earth and so a lot of theologians I can’t quite understand what they write, but I could understand much of what he wrote. And, by the way, my admiration for Reinhold Niebuhr became known and his widow, after Reinhold Niebuhr died, came to the White House and gave me a collection of tapes of his sermons. For those who think that Jimmy Carter is a "born-again" Southern Baptist should think again. I wonder why Mohler did not call Carter on this? It might be that Mohler's own reconstructionist views have compromised his commitment to the Gospel. Mohler has been known to associate with "orthodox" Anglo-Papists simply because they oppose homosexuality and abortion. He also signed the Manhattan Declaration. One has to notice the similarities between liberal social justice and "conservative" social justice when it comes to transforming society:
“I didn’t.” It came out in a whispered groan. “I’m sorry.”
Heinrich Heine
Pam spray (because it's important to be healthy)
Then his assistant heads to Madam Jo and lays out the terms-sell her shares for the exact amount she put in, $1 million. Madam Jo is in the air, thinking Young Gul has got an investor but Jae Hyuk’s assistant quickly clears her up on that account since Young Gul never actuallt had any investment coming in. Although she balks, the assistant lays out their trump card, telling her Ga Young-the main designer for YGM is now working at J Fashion. A compensation for Madam Jo-her brand will be featured in J Fashion. She lays out a condition of her own- hire Jung Ah to work then. The deal is signed and although she’s not too happy about it, Jae Hyuk is smiling.
circa 1995
It started off wonderfully; the first drive we saw the white lions resting near Hide Dam, and a couple minutes later, Nkateko female leopard popped up at Hide Dam too and we had a nice sighting of her! The next morning after having spent about 10 minutes stopped to watch some birds at a Madash Dam, we pulled forward 5m and spotted Kuhanya female leopard, who had been resting on the water’s edge the whole time, yet had been concealed by a little bush! The next few days passed without a great deal to speak of – although Grant and I saw Kuhanya one afternoon while out on a little bumble – and just when I was starting to lose faith, things suddenly got exciting!
taken to hospital,
was coming to the Bournemouth Pavilion ballroom, I knew it was to be a success. On the day itself, the event attracted hundreds and hundreds of bargain-hunting, vintage-loving individuals, all searching for that special something to add to their wardrobes, drawers and dressing tables.
“In coordination with the Afghan government, my administration has been in direct discussions with the Taliban,” he said. “We’ve made it clear that they can be a part of this future if they break with al Qaeda, renounce violence and abide by Afghan laws.” He said “many members of the Taliban” are interested in reconciliation.
When it comes to the events surrounding the life and death of Jesus, even before any discussion of the resurrection, the concentration on an individual person and a specific event itself sits at odds with leading historiographical trends, without introducing what people have come to call the supernatural. (I see “supernatural” as a philosophical category which is, to say the least, open to theological critique, even if it is often a useful shorthand.)
would give birth to a pearl
This is one of those unassuming books that actually far exceeded my expectations. Rather overlooked in the current wave of YA paranormal and dystopian fiction, this is the kind of novel that can be enjoyed by the full sweep of the YA target audience, and is a proper little page-turner to boot.
Often times people (non-writerly people) will ask, "Can't anybody just publish their own writing nowadays?"
Acting as your team’s apologist
She slammed the door for her last word,
He drew the blinds. You know the mind; I thought of
EOH: The House’s Office of Congressional Ethics charges against you were initially made more than one year ago. Why are they just being made public now?
Which may explain why the current Everyday Mormon Writer combination of Nick Stephen's "The Garden Gate" and Jake Balser's "Beginning Ghazal" means so much to me. There's something that just feels natural to me about seeing two Mormons explore one of the stories we Latter-day Saints value most by borrowing old Iranian motifs and forms. And yet--I don't think I ever would have expected to see it. Never would have expected to see two grown-up Mormon boys, each within a few years of my own age, letting their imaginations mix Sunday School with styles from lands in the middle of Asia.
"Good afternoon, ma'am," one of them answers. There's two of them, a guy with a dopey-looking haircut, and a drop-dead gorgeous red-head. They're wearing dark suits, dark sunglasses, and they're both flashing badges. "FBI. We'd like to have a word with you."
I’m not going any further with plot or spoilers. The whole thing was a mystery anyway I’ll just end by saying: Totally didn’t see the killer coming. And, dang, that person was crazy!
This idea, however, is a bit ironic to those of us who consider homeschooling something of an ancient practice, the way all humans learned until the development of compulsory schools—which, in America, was only around 100 years ago. How on earth did our ancestors learn anything, I always want to respond, when they were too busy working the fields, caring for one another, doing chores, and, well, living every day? Funny how literacy rates were higher back then, too.
Q: Let’s talk technology. Working in television must require a certain level of knowledge when it comes to various programs and what-not. What sort of innovations, if any, is your company going through and what does that mean for you?
But I wanted it to be different.
Circumstances being what they were I had little recourse because phone dude was true to his word and pulled up in my driveway just minutes after I learned what was going on. Matters were made worse after all three of us drove to a local bank to get sale paperwork notarized. I learned that a similar 1984 Camaro coupe in fair condition, like mine, should have sold for about fifteen-hundred dollars in 1995.
At winnock-bunker (window seat), i' the east,
J: Do you have any classical musical influences?
Very aboriginal video game:
I am Sananda, and I am at your service always.
My wheels are always spinning.
Finally, the most recent nickname that I became especially attached to, which isn’t so recent at all, is SexySweets. Sweet, original and flattering. The V-Man called me that for four years, even during the long spell when we weren’t a couple. The name is bittersweet for me now, as many endings are.
He will definitely take pride of place once I get the house decorated for Christmas (we still have no kitchen at the moment and our house looks like a war-zone). Ho Hum!
I've known people who went beyond simple lies to extravagant lies. Like Groves and Brown those other liars got called out for lying. But both Groves and Brown must be pretty good at it to have gotten away with it for so long with family, friends and coworkers. If I knew them, and had believed their stories, then found out their records proved them liars I'd wonder what other lies they'd told. But it doesn't mean they need to go to jail, especially if they didn't do it for financial gain. Since humans are by nature liars, and we lie all the time for one reason or another, from little fibs to big whoppers, I'm reluctant to make lying for the purposes of self-aggrandizement a crime.
Indeed, Emery says he far prefers the fresh air and sunny climate in the Magnolia State to the "morose" Vancouver weather.
Do you rush right out to see the movies adapted from books you love, or do you avoid them?
This painting is available $ 150.00 email me if you are interested ,nlcasey@charter.net
In my world, nylons and their kin are like Swiss army knives. They were designed for multiple purposes. They're useful when:
Secondly, he's a bloody great hypocrite for trying to wriggle out of engaging in debate on state control by boasting that he voted for the draconian legislation in the first place.
But the new find is another Peruvian speciality, the antichuchos. You get a plate with thin slices of marinated beef grilled on skewers. It's a slightly chewy texture, but a rich beef flavor, a bit salty from the marinade and perfectly paired with the spicy tomato salsa served on the side.
I had to make all of them~except the mulch, BUT I had to haul it and put it in place! Does this count? LOL!
This recipe courtesy of Weight Watchers. (8 servings; 2 points per serving)
Gardening is a natural tool for teaching kids about healthy lifestyle choices. Involvement in the growing process may lead to an increased willingness to try new foods, expanding the array of fruit and vegetable options that a child will eat. Most children simply don’t eat enough fruits and vegetables, and what better way to encourage them than to allow them to get their hands dirty?
6) Grab my button and post a link to where it is (3 entries)
Rnd 6) Knit even
AEI Sells 98.16% Interest In Vengas To PDVSA 21
save you. EXPERIAN, TRANSUNION and EQUIFAX are bankrupt
In order to secure more bail out-funds, Greek Finance Minister Evangelos Venizelos wants to cut Greece’s 2012 budget. This would involve rescinding pay raises for public employees and lay-offs for public employees that were hired in 2010 and 2011. Such budget cuts could have an adverse effect on more than 20,000 people.
quantity of our peacekeeping
"Well-rounded characters are distinctly individual; you come to understand their motivations, flaws, emotional traits, and other distinctive qualities. These can be related through a character’s actions, his reactions to situations and other characters, dialogue, and also through narrative. A flat character, in contrast, usually carries only one distinguishing trait or might act predictably or according to stereotype."
Any thoughts or experiences that you would like to share... I would love to hear it!
GENDER: if the parents know put that gender down if not, you can enter either M or F as we’ll ask you to update it at the time of birth
Not much is up… until he is diagnosed with a rare cancer. His girlfriend turns out not-really-caring about him. Pretty depressing it should be. Also pretty corny the story can be. However, this movie 50/50 comes up with a little different approach, trying not to be too dramatic nor panicking.
The invention remedies this impediment by providing a new swim paddle that does not permit the swimmer to use extended finger pressure. In fact, the swimmer may fold the fingers around the leading edge of the paddle and grip it.
Boys get discovered as winter melts
Let us get ‘the Polanski factor’ out of the way first. As any regular reader of this blog will know, I think the rich fugitive rapist should be rotting in some stinking prison cell in California.
Brian Winters – Reuters, 05/03/2012
Sophie Griffin
12 Messin' the Blues
-At age 20, he found himself on the big league roster due to the bonus baby rules. He went hitless in five at-bats, but still received a full share of bonus money when New York won the World Series that fall.
Dr. Chickenhiemer clucked his great annoyance and tried to escape Bantum’s enormous grip to no avail. He was not going to make it into the dark opening, was he?
To let base clouds o’ertake me in my way,
1. Percival, John. The Hop and its English varieties, 1901.
SB 1.17.35
“It’s a public course and we paid just like everybody else,” Hampe said.
Before watching the final episode of this anime series, I couldn’t help but think what type of ending was in store for us the viewers and I couldn’t think of one for the simple reason that the series has been so unpredictable that it could have ended in a multitude of ways. The happy ending that was delivered to us was, at least to me, a little surprising. Oh and my misconception that all the BRS characters were fighting in the same alternate world was cleared up.
of Meet The Press
The labourers in the quarries of the gods,
The Executive Chef is the highest position in the industry. Their primary function is to manage the food preparation and cooking for a restaurant. Often, an executive chef will be responsible for a chain of restaurants or other food service establishments. Some of the work involved are planning menus, estimating food requirements and costs, and supervising the work of sous-chefs, chefs and cooks, and other kitchen staff. They also take care of the hiring and recruitment of kitchen staff. Depending on the occasion, some executive chefs may cook regularly while others may cook for only for special occasions.
As for the design, I used black fabric paint to post a line from one of the character's of the Hollows series, "For the love of Tink!" on it and then painted tiny foot prints since the character is a pixie.
Two and a half millennia ago the shadowy Scythians of Herodotus – Aryan savages whose country was the horse – simmered just beyond the reach of civilisation, like a ghastly protoplasm of all that was to come. Then the Huns flooded over the shattered Roman Empire in a ravening swarm – fetid men clothed in whatever they had slaughtered, even the sewn skins of fieldmice – and they did not stop until they had reached Orleans, and their rude king Attila had died in unseasonable bridebed, and their kingdom flew to pieces. But the Avars followed them – long-haired centaurs who rocked Constantinople and were eventually obliterated by Charlemagne at the dawn of the ninth century. Soon afterwards an enfeebled Byzantium let in the Magyars, and the fearsome Pechenegs rushed in after – Turanian peoples, all of them, who evaporated at last in the gloomy European forests, or settled to become Christian on the Great Hungarian Plain.
Some photos of sets from the film ...
I love to dance. I love to sing. In fact, throughout my 20′s, dancing is the number one way I stayed fit. But dancing in Church? No way! In fact, I distinctly remember feeling a long frown on my face as the organ ground away on those impossible melodies- more like dirges than a medium to worship the most exciting Person who ever lived!
1. Write unique content that’s free of bad stuff. This includes language, images and other nasty things. No wonder I have yet to be pressed! I break this rule all the time. You may have noticed the pictures in this post have deviated from my standard “google keywords and then post the image’s that a find with some pithy title” approach to blogging. All of these new images are painstakingly hand drawn, and are owned by yours truly. I also have written a single swear word in this post so far!
Reese Witherspoon and Lindex
The politicians in Africa have titles like Junior Jesus, Servants of the Poor, Friend of the Poor, King of Africa but they are all lies. None of them cares for the poor but their own stomach. Because they care only for their interests, that is why the people have no jobs, no incomes, no savings and have no place to lay their heads. That is why farmers continue to farm using hoes and cutlasses, rely on nature to plant their crops; and have no access to improved seeds, irrigation facilities and credit. That is why children go to school barefooted, on an empty stomach and attend classes under trees while the politicians' children receive education in Europe and America.
From all of this we see that by nature everyone is blind; the Gentiles because God gave them up according to Romans 1:24 and then the Jews because of their rejection of all three persons of the Godhead. How can that blindness be removed?
Imtithal: (Maisa makes faces while Imtithal cries.) You are a wretched fool! You do not know how to care! All you do is make people feel dumb and insecure! Every inch of your soul suggests nothing but pure evil!
Foundem complaint said that Google had the “ability to arbitrarily penalize rivals and systematically favour its own services.”
In addition to being an easily recognizable condition, laryngitis is a self-limiting condition that goes away on its own. In most cases, laryngitis can be treated at home.
The first time you hear about a new recreational drug is on the ABC news.
There have been a number of cases from the European Court that have made it clear that the appeal period starts on the day after the decision of the Court. It has come to light that a number of legal experts contacted the Home Office to ensure they were aware that the appeal period ended on the 18th April. Somehow this information was overlooked and the arrest went ahead followed immediately by the inevitable appeal. This now means that, once again, Qatada cannot be deported and another lengthy and expensive appeals process will now commence.
Do not attempt to touch yourself up and make yourself something other than you really are; but come as you are to Him who justifies the ungodly . . . the gospel will receive you into its halls if you come as a sinner, not otherwise. Wait not for reformation, but come at once for salvation. God justifies the ungodly, and that takes you up where you now are: it meets you in your worst estate.
To save extra painting (and because it's already nice and neutral) we decided to retain the original colour on the upper walls. It is Dulux Chalk USA as per the rest of our house.
The Khmer Rouge believed parents were tainted with capitalism. Consequently, children were separated from parents and indoctrinated in communism as well as taught torture methods with animals. Children were a “dictatorial instrument of the party” and were given leadership in torture and executions.
Can anyone think of a good candidate for the next line of over budgeted, over publicized movies?
Once the jack fruit and green gram are done,pour the filtered jaggery syrup over this and mix well...
A beach is such an intense place to feel the power of the ocean, sun, and wind simultaneously. Step out of the car, feel the warmth of the sun (We religiously wore SPF 50 and our hats!). Stand in the ocean, the waves pull at the sand under your feet. Soon, we were back in the car to climb a next hill to find a next beach. And more beaches there were – a whole island of them! My favorite part of the trip was the beauty – simply, a gorgeous place. God had fun when he created Tobago.
In a nutshell (and I do mean nut) here are my final thoughts:
A leading figure in Macedonia’s main opposition party has accused the country’s trade union federation, the SSM, of being docile to the centre-right government of Prime Minister Nikola Gruevski, which the party says has drastically curbed workers’ rights.
WHOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOSHHHHHHHHHHH!!!!
Now that I am back from my Labor Day vacation, it is time to get ready for my favorite season - Fall!!
Love the fashions and the cherry trees in full bloom.
-LOWENSTEIN SANDLER PC-
some cider and a clemen-
Uh-oh …
Kobe Short Rib Pot Pie ($29) baked oyster zucchini champagne cream, caramelized sweet onion sauce. Loved the description on this one, and it was a cute presentation with a bloated pastry puff topped by an oyster baked with zucchini champagne cream and cheese. The contents of the pot pie were infused with rich flavor (interesting that the chef used a 'white' sparkling wine versus the expected red wine) with fairly generous large chunks of meat - though it was just a tad chewier than I expected for Kobe. But overall very nicely done pot pie, and I loved the buttery flakey pastry puff.
Hope you had a good Weekend! Mine was AWESOME with Son Andrew's Graduation from College yesterday,,,,,,and a FUN day with Customers in Joyworks today!
April 5– Saturday– Washington, D.C.– President Lincoln orders Major General John Dix to take control of the police force of Baltimore, Maryland, and “to arrest and imprison disloyal persons, declare martial law, and suspend the writ of habeas corpus in the city.”
Congratulations bear
It will also be of great help in my future studies, which will require me to travel to several conferences in different cities. I’ll actually be able to leave the hotel and get back safely. I wish I would have made this purchase ages ago.
STONEHOUSE UNIVERSITY AUTHOR WEBINARS
Like my Dripping Blood Crown
The kids are noisy I suppose, but it is lovely noise- the noise of kids. I will miss it when I don't hear it anymore. That is the kind of noise that fills the soul and we oh so often forget to remember that.
“Powers Energy Investor noted that Chesapeake and Southwestern had claimed average EUR’s in the Fayetteville of as much as 2.4-2.6 Bcf. But there has never been a single shale well in the Fayetteville play that has ever produced more than 1.7 BCF according to production data filed with the Arkansas Oil and Gas Commission. Most do well to produce even 1 Bcf and the average for Chesapeake wells is 541 mcf.” ….. I believe the last measurement should read Mmcf ? ie Million cubic Feet…
Rupert Murdoch 'not fit' to lead major international company, MPs conclude.
Their hits included:
***Spoilers may follow, so just quit reading now if you don't like spoilers.***
It dawned on me that these dolls are meant to be "collected". Meaning it's normal for people to update their collection, and that this is what makes the hobby interesting and exciting. And now I wonder what I have gotten myself into... hhaaha... (Ｔ▽Ｔ)
Anna and the Innkeeper are off on holiday. There are places in South Africa that we have not yet seen, and this year we are going to make a determined attempt to whittle the list down. So we will wend our way slowly upcountry, through the Karoo, the Free State, the Natal Midlands, the Transkei and so back to Wilderness. Along the way we intend stopping where we are moved to stop and take our time to explore the countryside. We have no bookings – glorious freedom to do what we want, when we want and go where we want.
October 17, 2009 - 1 - 3pm
This is the same Peggy Noonan who three and a half years ago was writing paens to Obama's greatness. She called anyone who saw through his act a long time before she did an idiot...especially Governor Sarah Palin.
So what’s so funny about this? Because of my age, the chance of another pregnancy after this one, of us trying for #2 if this one works out alright, is less than slim. So I want to experience pregnancy fully, enjoy it for all it’s worth. So while I am more than happy that this pregnancy is treating me pretty well so far, I do feel a little bit cheated out of the experience. Crazy, isn’t it?
But if you want to have original names look to your wedding’s location or theme for ideas. You can also use the color of the drink for inspiration and you don’t have to have the word “cocktail” in the title.
Paid: $3 total
At the end of the day, the result is the only thing that matters, that’s why we deliver our best work to date and we are satisfied with every aspect of it.
Last night was the finale of Survivor. I must say that I’m kind of glad that it’s over. I didn’t really care for any of the people on the show this time.
And then I thought about y'all.
Now the church tries to clean this up saying “well they’re in sin because they are not married.”
After reading about 40,000 conflicting opinions on do-it-yourself-bacon on the interwebz, here's what I've decided to do.
The images were taken last year, later in the spring, when the irises were blooming and things had greened up considerably.
● Malaria is an epidemic that kills 1 million Africans annually.
My point is this: When it comes to exposure and efficiency Facebook falls short of what a blog can do for you and your company. Responses on Facebook can give you immediate support, agreement or encouragement which is great for your personal life. But your professional life requires a different perspective that weighs the return of your time investment against results and in this arena, for most of us because of the way we use it, Facebook simply can't get the job done as efficiently as a blog.
Then there was the AP’s May description of Obama’s failure to comply with the 60-day requirement to seek congressional authorization for continuing to have U.S. troops involved in Libya under the War Powers Act. In this instance, AP told its readers that Obama was merely “skipping a legal deadline.” Uh, no; he was breaking the law.
I also enjoyed the use of the word function in the film. To many this may not seem so great, but I love it. I noticed on my trip to India the liberal use of the term function for many different events. Here in the US, we’d more likely just say what the actual event is, e.g. a party, a wedding, a concert, a lecture, etc., but it seems in India they just keep it simple and say function. I do like it though, and have been working steadily to use it as often as I can now. It’s really a lot more mysterious to go to a function and just let people wonder what that function is. There really are so many functions that we all have to attend each day. In fact I have to wrap up this post since I’m going to a function. (function = I’m going to put a movie in the DVD player and watch it.)
like they do on warmer days & nights
Psalm: 45
"Why is a mouse when it spins?" (Full points if you get the reference.)
my cousin had a birthday party
“There is a sense of fury that the government seems impotent, unable to act when the man chiefly responsible for the bank’s collapse is able to walk away with a pension that others can only dream of — and at the ripe old age of 50!” said Dave Pickering, a spokesman for the Edinburgh Association of Community Councils, in an email. “And what makes it worse is that we, the British taxpayers, are actually paying for it!”
I think that’s about the summary of things as they stand. We’re waiting on the glucostrips to come in, and next week I’ll be sequestered without a litter box for a bit so that Mom can make sure I have a full bladder before taking me to the vet.
"Nine or Ten," D. answered not quite catching on yet that his dad had said cock instead of caulk.
Here is the second Candy Bar Gift Holder that I made for Joans Weekly Challenge this week, please read the post below for dies used, sorry combined the two posts, just can not type much. Below is also the information about this weeks challenge at Joan's.
The neo-Nazi Golden Dawn has been considerably less successful: while younger Greek voters are deserting the Establishment in droves, they clearly have no desire to join the SS: in most areas it is at the lower end of the rankings. However, with only five days left, roughly 16% of voters remain undecided.
Aboriginal art can be appreciated through the stone engravings and in the ceramic creations with geometrical designs, that were used as domestic utensils, as well as decorative objects. The most representative dish is known as a gánigo (a typical clay dish of Guanche craftsmanship that can be found in the Museum of Nature and Man and the Archaeological Museum , both in Tenerife), other less abundant ceramic forms are the plates, terracotta knives, tabonas (objects made with black stones in the shape of flagstones that were used to cut, lance and flay).
Then I’ll bow goodbye and let you leave
Hi friends,
Lauren and Duncan's wedding was about their love. You could feel it in the chilly May air, and it made for one of the most memorable days ever. It was perfect. I'm not going to wax lyrical too much about the day, I'll let some of the pictures do the talking.
While we were in Hawaii my parents were kind enough to take Preston for us. They were so sweet to him and I know he had such a good time there. He came home using words more and actually would help me clean up when I ask him to without me having to help him. WHAT!? I think he needs to spend more time at Grandma and Grandpa’s house! He spent the days that my parents had to work with Mindy or Angie along with their children. I’m sure he had a blast with his cousins.
Mom turned 50, I just graduated from college. Despite my grandparents being ill, so having cancelled the trip in early May and then re-scheduling it to May 15th to May 20th, upon landing there we realised – some intangible force had brought us there for when we returned our positive energies made ‘home’ a richer time with family too!
Doodles
What will be.
Affliction renders the creature tasteless, and the
when my skin feels as soft as a babys bottom
As the legal case came to an end, I left the agency and was hired as Guide Corporation’s first director of corporate communication. Part of my job was to help rebuild the company’s shattered relationships.
On my first card I like to show you today I used 'Lilipad Dreams' from the Fairy Friends Collection. I colored using only Prisma Pencils and no Blender. DP is from Creative Impressions and MME. Dies are Spellbinders and Magnolia. Border punch is from MS. I added Stickles for some glitz.
I decided to maximize the play/use for this cute table as best I could... my sons reads on it, has snack time on it, plays with his cars/puzzles/toys on it, colors on it, etc., so I thought, "Why not color with chalk on it, too?" :)
After the opening ceremony on February 12, the world premiere of the restored original version of Fritz Lang’s Metropolis will be transmitted live to the public from the Friedrichstadtpalast to a screen at the Brandenburg Gate. The public is invited to enjoy this significant moment in the history of film – free of charge – at this very special setting.
5. Practice good preventive care. In addition to taking care of your dog when he is sick, preventing health problems with good preventive care is also a great way to show your love. Prevent fleas, ticks and heartworm with appropriate medications from your veterinarian.
Ask God to show you possible open doors of service. You might be surprised at what you see. —Dennis Fisher
Apologies for the lack of posting folks, but recently things have been rather busy at Mordue Brewery. On top of the seemingly endless hours of racking, brewing, washing casks, sorting out brew schedules, rescheduling brew schedules and so forth has come the risks of utility and ingredient shortages and the burden of watching over so many fermentations. Why do they come to me to die? Why do they come to me to die? For the last few sundays now (the only day I'm not working around 12 hours) I have felt unable to do hardly anything at all but sit slightly traumatised for most of the day within a fantasy world of lying on a reclining chair sipping camomile tea in a Japanese garden with no sound but that of the running water features.
While the tarts are baking, prepare the glaze. I used a coffee mug to mix my glaze since I wanted it thick and needed so little. Place confectioners’ sugar into mug and slowly add in milk or heavy whipping cream until desired consistency is reached. Scrape the seeds of 1/2 vanilla bean into the glaze and stir well.
One serious problem with visceral fat found around the stomach is that it produces, in large amounts an immune system chemical call cytokines, which can increase the risk of cardiovascular disease if released in larger than normal amounts. Another major reason why fat tissue in the abdominal area is so harmful is its close proximity to the portal vein, which carries blood from the intestinal area to the liver. The issue here is that free fatty acids, released by the visceral fat, can enter the liver disrupting its function, causing high cholesterol levels and insulin resistance.
Samuel P. Huntington's now almost legendary essay about The Clash of Civilizations has generated a lot of discussion, and some justified criticism. Some would claim that there is no clash of civilizations, just a clash between a global, universal civilization and Islamic neo-barbarism. But Huntington does have some points. The West is still the leading civilization on the planet, but it is in decline. Both because we constitute an ever-shrinking part of global demography, and because we have lost confidence in our own culture. The beginning of the 21st century could perhaps be labelled "the retreat of the Western order", as the Islamic world is challenging us ideologically and China in particular is challenging us economically.
Other than them, we’re left with three Downtown Comics locations, Comic Book University (always the best FCBD selection when it comes to indie company representation), and a couple of mom-’n'-pop joints with whom I’m out of touch. I know of Dee Puppy Comics only by their frequent appearance in Google results. I lost track of Collector’s Paradise when they moved out of the Liberty Bell Flea Market to somewhere I failed to find even when I had Mapquest directions in my hand. Last winter we stumbled across a hole-in-the-wall joint off the Martinsville town square, but we could only peer through their locked door because it was Saturday morning and their day wouldn’t begin till 2 p.m.
Apple Dumplings
French and British troops had, at the height of the Civil War, encircled the US. The British sent 11,000 troops to Crown-controlled Canada, which gave safe harbor to Confederate agents. France’s Napoleon III installed Austrian Hapsburg family member Archduke Maximilian as his puppet emperor in Mexico, where French troops massed on the Texas border. Only an 11th-hour deployment of two Russian warship fleets by US ally Czar Alexander II in 1863 saved the United States from re-colonization. That same year the Chicago Tribune blasted, “Belmont (August Belmont was a US Rothschild agent and had a Triple Crown horse race named in his honor) and the Rothschilds…who have been buying up Confederate war bonds.”
He got a Knighthood, a meaningless bauble
Meg and I are both the oldest of our siblings, so I relate best to her. However, I find Charles Wallace to be the most interesting, though he's so young he does things I didn't want him to do. Well, Meg didn't want him to do those things, either. On the other hand, in some ways I relate best to Calvin O'Keefe (see the quote below).
Considering that this was the biggest turn out for one of the block trips yet, I was very happy that there was going to be something to see. Now we just needed the all clear from the Principle that the recent poor weather had cleared up enough for kayaking, if it hadn’t then he wouldn’t let us out … when we arrived in Makino the weather was overcast and the water was a little choppy, but ‘thumbs up’, we were cleared to go.
On the wrong side of the material draw lines M-N and O-P parallel to the fold line X-Y and ¼” away from the fold line, these are the seam lines.Divide the fabric above the line M-N and below the line O-P in to squares as shown in the figure 3 by drawing lines. Cut along these lines till you reach lines M-N and O-P.
That being said, I was surprised by all the pretty awesome things at the dollar store during my last visit. Sometimes, that same thing you'll buy at the mall, or on ebay, can be found at your dollar store for a fraction of the price. Everything is made in China by the same factories, right? Time we get our heads out of the sand. I recently bought an iPhone car charger there, and guess what? It works!
Be moved to climb from underneath
With apologies. . .
It goes beyond just super-powered abilities, but personality traits. Steve Rogers summarizes it best:
A fb comment or like here a text message there.
All that I am, or hope to be, I owe to my angel mother.
Sheer Top: Thrifted
The sauce will keep about 5 days in the fridge.
1:30PM - Cook the bacon rolls under the grill. Turn halfway through. They will take about 10 minutes total. Place in a casserole in the bottom of the oven once cooked.
After ten years Will Smith and Tommy Lee Jones return to their roles as agents J and K in the Men in Black franchise. This time Will Smith’s character, agent J, must return to the 1960s and meet the younger K (Played by Josh Brolin) in order to save his life. My question is, do we really need another Men in Black movie and why wait 10 tens to get one made. Regardless it’s coming this month and with a slew of new aliens and the original two stars, people will flock to this movie.
1-1/4 cups chocolate chips
Alexia also wears two very pointy hair sticks, one of wood and one of silver. These are prudent accessories with vampires and werewolves living in London. Mine are made of chopsticks, one plain, ond the other covered with aluminum tape.
The girl will probably get the entirety of her former boyfriends estate pursuant to the combined effect of the Administration and Probate Act and the "Relationships Act".
Anyway..it was fun. Girls can EAT though...hot wings, honey bbq wings, strawberries, bananas, celery, oven fries & deviled eggs for dinner. All night snacks? Fun Dip, Sprite, Monster, popcorn, doritos, oreo ice cream cake. And that was all before I went to BED! Breakfast was banana bread, kiwi and strawberries and deviled eggs. Right now? They're at the store getting donuts and energy drinks. Crazy Fools! Good think all but one of em are going home today.
LIKE THIS BAKING PAN......
THE REPLY DEMOLISHED
3/14/2012 Phoenix, AZ- TBA
Personally, I’m excited about this. Sweeney is a great guy to have on the club and he also is a broadcaster’s dream: he works quickly and throws strikes.
5. We both cast our votes at the same political party
5. Escada Taj Sunset- A scent of tropical sensuality, it opens with a burst of citrusy blood orange and the exotic, fruity aroma of the Alphonso mango-the first fragrance to capture this unique note. Next, floral and fruity heart notes emerge, including watery blossom, sweet primrose, and raspberry. The scent lingers on a sexy, beach-inspired base of coconut cream, musky notes, and sandalwood.
Cokes I drank: 1
It started with a killer cold coming to visit me Friday morning.
Blacksburg, Virginia – April 16, 2007: 23-year-old Seung Hui Cho shot to death 32 students and faculty of Virginia Tech, wounding 17 more, and then killing himself. He had received prior mental health treatment, however his mental health records remained sealed.
10:27: Dr Patrick Basham begins his speech.
But in all seriousness...I hope this makes your Monday.
One can easily come to any and all these conclusions simply by reading the professional papers of such scientists and researchers. Not once do any of these papers express concern for the subjects at hand or denote any pangs of conscience at violating any oaths, codes and statutes regarding patient rights, human rights or human dignity. That America’s most shameful period of human experimentation, the years 1950 through to about 1979, came on the heels of the making and adoption of the Nuremberg Codes only adds to the shame and hypocrisy. Today, human experimentation is still aggressively conducted by US government-sponsored and employed physicians and scientists regardless of those codes, which came directly out of the shocking madness of the Nazi era. That government-sponsored experimentation still occurs makes a mockery of any governmental efforts, however valid, to protect people from science run amok – and a nation that uses its young, its children, for such pursuits is a nation whose commitment to human rights and democratic principles should be seriously questioned and challenged.
But the rest? I love.
Was it all worth killing someone over? Running over an innocent pedestrian?
This was the first love story I ever read (Anne was the second, coincidentally), and I never realized how much it had shaped my ideas of love until I reread the series two winters ago. It's an even sweeter unfolding than Meg + John or Anne + Gil. It's simple. It always makes me smile, even chuckle softly. And Almanzo is such a wonderful hero -- he's gentle, he's brave, he's just a boy. I mean, really. I want the kind of guy who can gentle wild horses with a whisper. Plus, of all the couples I've listed: this one is a real-life couple.
Disc Four (2003)
I, myself, do not have a rating system. My satisfaction with a place, item, or experience is cut and dry. I either lose my mind or I don’t. As long as my kids are happy, I don’t lose my mind. And as long as I don’t lose my mind, I will have something nice to say. Call me a Positive Percy, but I want readers to want a great experience. If necessary, I’ll even throw in a tip or two on how to make you’re experience better than mine.
Barbara, thanks a million for hosting me today and for the delicious home-baking; it’s been lovely chatting to you. Next week my virtual tour brings me to England to the home of short story writer and novelist Elizabeth Baines. I'd love if some of your readers would join me there.
1) The Royal Wedding: In late Spring of 2011 there was one event that created quite the buzz, especially in the entire year leading up to it: the Royal Wedding between Prince William and Kate Middleton. It was all anyone was talking about, especially women. Everyone was so excited to see who would be at the event, what would take place, and how everyone looked- especially the beautiful bride and her sexy sister, Pippa. Just about every realm of PR was used to hype up this event; Prince Will and Kate graced just about every magazine and even newspaper cover across America and many other countries, as well as trending on Twitter. Many restaurants opened at wee hours of the morning to gather people together to watch the wedding on TV and have a British-styled breakfast of tea and crumpets. Bravo, Royals, bravo.
18) Save, save, save!!!
I was in shock. And pretty pissed, mind you. This bitch looked like she had been rode hard and put away wet a LOT in the 70's, before I was even born. She was NOT cuter than me (this said while crossing my arms and stomping my foot like a toddler). Had I not been drunk, I know it wouldn't have bothered me. Anyway, I told Tara about it, and she laughed, and we made fun of middle aged lady all night. It was pretty fun.
So far, I like it. Pages 3-7 asks the question “What is Mindfulness?”
*The janitor walks by, carrying the bag of questionable substances.*
Monday was a rest day for her. Tuesday I rode before work. We did a 30 min hack that included a little 3 rep set of 1 min trot, 30 second canter. Simple.
Hello and welcome to the gradual report. My name is so important you should delete your own name from your memory in order to make room for mine. Today, we continue our important work by investigating the social implications of exchanging germs through the mouth, by the mouth. Or is it as referred to by modern day colloquial English – kissing… a How To Guide.
Reviewed by Sophie Fuggle.
9/23 Puyallup, WA- Western Washington Fair
15) ‘Am I Ugly?’ Videos: Young Teens Ask YouTube Users Whether They’re Pretty Or Not But, in a world of carefully curated Facebook profiles that put personal lives (and looks) at center stage…it’s perhaps unsurprising that young people are sharing their body image anxieties in such a forum.
Make the disease scat,
I convinced myself it was my thyroid. Or anemia. So I went to the doctor for blood work. Unfortunately I let myself wallow in this gray area for longer than I should have. I tried to go to my OB-GYN a few times, but they said (over the phone) that they couldn't help me - that I needed to see my primary care physician. Probably because I told them I was having thyroid problems. But I wish they would have recognized the reality behind what I was saying. I told them I felt like my hormones were going crazy. That my body felt exhausted and drained of all energy. That I felt off.
So now all we can do is wait to feel better, wait for the sun to shine, wait for our trip to AZ, wait for my mom to come, wait for me to loose the last 10 pounds that don't want to leave my bottom. WAIT WAIT WAIT!!! What else is a mom to do????
There are lots of experiences to tell about studying at ELTC, and I want to share some of them with you.
8. I’m a massive fan of opera – False – If I wanted to see some fat lady sing in a foreign language, I’d take public transportation in Philly.
Last year, West German sympathisers deliberately blighted the potato harvest and caused widespread shortages throughout the Democratic Republic. We are, of course, perfectly capable of coping with such transparent attempts to sabotage the efforts of our farmers thanks to generous donations of turnip and newspaper flat-cakes generously donated to East Germany by our fraternal comrades in the Soviet Union.
In other words: Born in the wrong decade. Next…
Maybe, at one point, the topic had turned to the FnB business, because something roused E@L enough for him to interject a line on how he is poised to become a squidillionare, if his private shares in Wooloomooloo (opening soon in Singapore, folks) keep capitalizing up. This turned Terry's attention to him for the first time. Terry paused.
I also saved a large box of Smarties for our movie tomorrow! Another taste of home!I think I am going to have to run every day this weekend just to keep up with the caloric intake planned for the festivities LOL
and i feel like i only scratched the surface!
“Does my bum look big in this, GB?” she asked coyly.
July 17 – Darien Center, NY @ Darien Lake Performing Arts Center
It was getting late,
She was no ordinary dog. She could make humans hear her. Of course humans would mistake Hope’s words for their own thoughts. Most humans did, anyway. But dogs knew.
I'm delighted about the rise of ebooks, as new ways to deliver our words to readers. But I don't find the need to call them something different from books. Just as a paperback book is a format, so is an ebook.
Death is the natural guarantee of life. It is the complement of birth; one cannot exist without the other. It is also the only other part of life that simply just happens. You cannot know when you are born, or how death will happen upon you. Perhaps the spirit is well aware of both, but.. that is another sphere.
Dallas vs Miami 2:30 ET on ABC
3. Pass the cost increase on to the consumers, which includes low income workers
Martin Schaefer, spokesman for the German consulate, said: “The corpse is being flown to his (Gemballa’s) home. We have offered our consular services in terms of issuing official documents for customs and the like.”
Lots of "crafts" as Bella calls anything involving crayons or markers. Farrah is getting into this now, too! It's fun when activities start holding their attention a little longer. She is so proud - she can draw circles, the letter "F" and the letter "A"!
We were really disappointed since we could have gone to a morning service if we had known the evening service wasn’t an option, and now it was too late to find another church option this week. We were doubly disappointed since Matt is working the next two Sundays, so we won’t have another chance to check out a new church for a while. Our whole day had been geared toward going to church tonight, and now we were so deflated we just turned around and went home. Driving back toward Santa Barbara, we hit major traffic and spent most of the journey back at an unsteady 6mph pace.
Nonetheless, I resisted the urge to run out today and purchase cool new pajamas for The Girls. That’s progress, right? Well don’t reward me yet, because I am seriously entertaining the possibility of letting them play hooky in favor of a Mommy/Daughters day complete with mani/pedis, or perhaps an educational outing to a museum or even a trip to the zoo.
Have I entrusted my life, my family, my work, my school to Jesus?
And what might those be, you ask? Good question!
drippings from the turkey
Cutaways and noddies will save your edit. You can’t have too many of them.
The worst case of a snobby traveler was when I met a girl at the Spicy Laos guesthouse in Luang Prabang. She told me that I “hadn’t seen Cambodia” because I didn’t go meditate/pray with some monks in some rural, middle-of-nowhere village. Apparently seeing Ankor Wat (jewel of Cambodia) and Phnom Pehn (capital of Cambodia) did not qualify me as seeing Cambodia. News to me. I have no problem with people doing what they want, but when they preach it onto others and put everything else down, then their opinion is rendered worthless to me.
wet … drizzle. Still, with a bit of spray paint, some dry paper that we had stored a bit better, and a lighter, we could start a fire.
So while I do miss the days of doing that, I know that it does not exist for now in South Africa and therefore there is nothing to miss.
4. I am thankful for the way the dew looks like glittering diamonds when the sun first hits it.
That sort of situation happens far more often than righteous lethal shootings do, yet these statistics aren't taken into consideration when gun control is debated, at least not by the gun grabbers. They'll tell you that you're better off disarmed, because the trespasser/criminal will just take your weapon and use it against you. Or you'll just shoot your own family up, unable to control your lethal impulses.
Julia Bohanna
Furthermore,being fully Compos Mentis due to the lack of the benefit of even a whisker of an alcoholic beverage,and being the last but one table to be served,these two had fully enjoyed the opportunity of witnessing the rest of the diners being served with their puds and having ample time to take in the attributes of said pudding in its full glory.
The Deadly Sword of Cormac by Robert E. Howard (Historical Adventure/Fantasy): During the Third Crusades, there was a renegade Knight so fierce that he was feared by Moslems and Crusaders alike. His name was Cormac FiztGeoffrey. This book collects both novelletes that Howard wrote featuring Cormac.
Since then, Randy has provided supports to develop a strategy for community-integrated respiratory supports. He made a written submission to the provincial government’s pre-budget consultation and met with his local Member of Provincial Parliament to raise awareness on the issue. As well, he regularly shares his story with others.
Slowly healing because of the love shined on me from my Superstar.
We went out for dinner and I had that drink. And it's funny, really, how going out for that much-needed drink acted as the catalyst for another one of our "Life" talks; the proverbial "Where Am I Going?" conversation that begins with me unleashing for the first ten minutes and then involves my very logical and very wise husband offering his perspective and objective opinion, all without judgement. While I sipped at my martini and stabbed holes in my cocktail napkin with the sword-shaped olive pick, I vented while he listened to my stream-of-consciousness and processed my thoughts in silence. And when I ended my vent-session with a deflated wish that I could just hit the "Reset" button, he asked me point-blank: "Why can't you?"
Salud!
Sit you down, father; rest youThis is from Act IV, Scene vi of Lear and is the scene in which the disguised Edgar kills Oswald in a sword fight. Edgar identifies Oswald, who is Goneril's manservant, as "a serviceable villain;/ As duteous to the vices of thy mistress/ As badness would desire"; this is an important theme in Lear: The role of servants and the issue of when it is a good servant's duty to defy the wishes of his master (or mistress) because he (or she) has gone astray. As Edgar notes, Oswald, in this sense, is a bad servant, because, though "duteous", he is so in service to Goneril's vices, which, if you've read the play, are legion. (There's a reason her name sounds like an STD. So maybe her vices are also lesion. HAR!1!)
Roode wins the match with a Crossface, good short match between the two. Tempers flared when punches were thrown, and Kurt looked a bit concerned, watching the monitor backstage. Kazarian and Roode shake hands after the match. Kazarian tells Bobby he is ready.
Asset Purchase 9
I returned home one day only to find that my girlfriend had moved out and taken everything with her, including her bed. I slept that night on the floor.
Whilst in Bonds’ case he did not get himself bogged down in detail or specifics, here Clemens was the opposite. He had some things he wanted to say, and therefore he said them. The problem was that lying to Congress is a serious offence. Further investigations took place and Clemens was indicted.
Here we go (all night long)
But talons have grown, with razor-sharp blade,
But I do know I’m on the edge. I can feel that lapping against my better judgement. The shores of sanity are being tested. So far the break walls are holding but I am having to be careful and I see myself getting frustrated just that little bit easier and wanting to lash out just a bit more often.
Eric's Middle School had a talent show last week. Eric and his buddies, Ryan and Lizzie, decided they wanted to form a band for the occasion. They decided to perform, "Dust in the Wind" by Kansas and put together a pretty cool arrangement if I do say so myself. They only had 2 minutes to work with, so they had to cut it down, and figure out how to put the vocals and bells in, but they ended up with something pretty fantastic.
She stopped in front of my desk and just looked at me. I didn’t like the look of sadness and defiance on her face.
That which You gave me the other day.
**** original liners begin here (some new info too!) ****
Bees are flying all around. The cherry tree is also in flower. Smell like spring is really on time this year! And the Cockers participate to the fest, as always, enthusiastically.
I am in the process of making thank you card for my son's graduation. I attempt yet another type of card. I think I really like the easel card and it really was easy to make. So here is my first easel card. I hope you enjoy. It is a little on the simple side (for me) but. I think it was pretty good to be my first. So until next time....
Please do leave a comment as I'm always open for new ideas :-))
All this in the name of fiscal responsibility, but:
Anyway, Coldplay fell completely off my radar, because really, why wouldn't they? Fast forward to 2010. I'm watching So You Think You Can Dance (don't judge, it entertains me), and I hear this song that I immediately fall in love with. I look down at the bottom of the screen at it says "Viva La Vida" - Coldplay. Picture my stunned face. Thought process: "I'm sorry, what? I like a Coldplay song? And not only like, but absolutely love love love it? No! No, unacceptable." So after the episode is over, I download the song. And I still love it. Thought process: "Oh, crap. After all the shit I gave Sarah for liking Coldplay....well, she just can't know, that's all." I swore Josh to secrecy and he never said a word. By the way, the song was actually released in 2008, which just proves how off my radar Coldplay really was.
DH is off those horrible annoying hours and has been taking some well deserved time off. Of course, he may feel he would be better off still working since we have stayed so busy catching up on things that were put on the back burner during that time.
1. I had yet another winning cup at Tim Horton’s. For those of you playing along at home, that’s two times this year!
By the end when Barbossa has his revenge and Blackbeard but cutting him with a poisoned blade and is dying, naturally Angelica is facing death too by stupidly grabbing the blade and pulling it from Blackbeard while Jack is frantically trying to complete the fountain of youth ritual. Next the typical one glass is poison, one glass is the antidote comes into play. Blackbeard selfishly drinks what he thinks is the Fountain of Youth, while Angelica drink the bad water, but of course we all know that the cups are switched and Blackbeard dies while Jack is not tempted once by the fountain of youth. But what make no sense is earlier on in the film its mentioned how Blackbeard had is head cut off, but he came back to life, but suddenly for no reason at all a simple poisoned blade can kill the magical captain that is Blackbeard.
Like emptiness and harmony, I need someone to comfort me (Simon & Garfunkle)
That can leave those who pray feeling very guilty
If you have not seen the movie Avatar (which I find totally not acceptable and you must go out and see it right now) you may not understand--so, like I said...go see it!
“My principles stand for themselves.
“P” – Can you use your global positioning system to locate the nearest restroom for me, like, RIGHT AWAY!
I cannot download all images onto my bog where I am at the moment, which is totally frustrating, but if you go to this post (see link below) and scroll down a bit, you will see some fabulous Art Nouveau embroidery patterns that would be a total work of art and look great in a frame. We could practice the satin stitch used to create these.
But, as paragraph 42 of the Hobgood order noted, Cline did not confine her squabble to Hudson.
"Oh my god! Look at this!" Loops shouts. "Oh my god!"
Dinner was a big salad with this lovely tomato and corn salsa. It was so delicious that I think I will probably make it for our big 4th of July party this summer. I drank about 14 glasses of water today, water really is a hunger killer, it truly makes you feel full.
(will possibly be developed into a series of shorter episodes.)
Mr. Campbell explains: “The massive muscles would evolve because gravity on Jupiter is two and a half to three times that of earth, requiring the expenditure of considerable energy. The atmosphere is so dense and deep that it is perpetual, unrelieved night, making eyes useless, hence undeveloped.
I just have realized that people only learn about some questions to annoy other people because they continue to be in charge of ignorance. If they were really concerned about Health issues, they should learn everything about the subject.
I think soft pink and pale orange are the most couture colors out there, and black of course.
The interlocutor in the argument, intelligent though he was, mistakenly attributed his view of the fall to Augustine, who he argued also believed that God willed the Original Sin. My response to this was to suggest that God did not will sin, as sin is defined as “missing the mark” (the word in Greek literally means missing the mark, and etymologically comes from an archer shooting at a target). The mark is set by the will and nature of God, such that to say that something is sinful is just to say that it is opposed in principle to morality, which is identified as a standard set by the very nature of God. I used a distinction I hadn’t used in a while, and which I’m sure is peculiar to me: between God’s ‘absolute’ will and his ‘complete’ will. I maintained that God’s absolute will can be satisfied without his ‘complete’ will being satisfied. C.S. Lewis once provided an excellent analogy for this, where he imagines that a preschool teacher wishes for all the children to put their things away at the end of the school day, but to do so of their own free will. She thus gives them the decision of whether or not to put their things away, and as a result, some freely choose to disregard the teacher’s invitation to put their things away. Now, while the teacher is not completely satisfied with the response of some of her pupils, her absolute will requires her to allow such a reaction. In similar fashion God willed for man to choose to love him freely, and as a result man was given a free choice, which God knew man could respond to by rejecting God in place of some other perceived good (which is what the Genesis narrative teaches). Therefore, although it is true to say that the Fall purchased for mankind a saviour which it would otherwise never have received, and a Gospel (good news) which would not otherwise have been so exceedingly ‘good’, so it is also true to say that the greater the sinner the more glorious the story of repentance and transformation (one thinks of figures such as Saul/Paul or St. Augustine). Neither one of these entail that God willed the sin in order for Grace to increase.
This first card is with the last of the printed toppers - I decided that with the end of the school term coming up, I needed a couple of teacher cards for my collection so that I might be able to sell them at the fair in the square I'm doing with Alison in a few weeks (Arghhh!! not nearly ready for this). I'm very proud of the stoppers on this easel card, they were hand drawn and coloured apples done on shrink plastic. The 'abcd's were done using my Moxy alphabet for the quickutz, spellbinders for the tag at the bottom and shape for Popcorn, the papers were free in a recent magazine (love that word - FREE). The bookshelf was stamped from the matching Popcorn stamp set and coloured with my Speccies.
Difference: +2.2
The companies announced today that Microsoft has invested $300 million into a new Barnes & Noble subsidiary, known as Newco until the company can come up with a name. The $300 million investment will give Microsoft a 17.6 percent equity stake in the firm. Barnes & Noble, which assumed a $1.7 billion valuation on the subsidiary, will retain 82.4 percent ownership.
I’ve never been to London, England, but if I ever get the chance to go I am going to have to eat at L’Art du Fromage. If anybody is aware of a similarly themed restaurant in Canada please add a comment to this post.
To complete the sea-aging experiment, BrewDog found an old recipe--either 150 or 200 years old; their material quotes both ages. Given that agriculture has changed so much in that time (not to mention the earth's climate), I don't imagine that the beer they brewed tastes like the ancient inspiration. The brewery used ancient English hops, but probably only Goldings (born in the 1780s) date back 200 years. Fuggles, the other hop in the recipe, is also an old strain, but is about a century younger. Maris Otter is typically used to approximate historic malts--as BrewDog has done with Atlantic IPA--but I have no idea how similar it is to the malts of the early-to-mid 19th Century. Still, the recipe seems a worthy effort to replicate an old recipe given ingredients available in the 21st Century.
Should ever be forgot
Guy also shocks us with the ‘Saint Veronica’ scene, in which the eponymous woman mops Jesus’s bleeding brow with a cloth as he bears the cross past her. As Jesus exits the frame, the actress opens the cloth to reveal an image of Jesus’s face. And then Guy cuts completely, to a closeup of the same woman, holding the cloth against a blank backdrop. Seeing the painterly image of Christ’s face on the cloth—looking nothing like a bloodstain—is strange enough; leaving the film’s universe altogether to emphasize it is stranger still. In this sequence, The Birth feels like a sermon, or maybe that moment of surprise when a faith healer bids a crippled man to rise, and he does, and we feel we ought to applaud. Showmanship, amid the sacred.
I’d brought my heart rate down a lot and was less shivery. The entire race that we were with was doing an inelegant shuffle to the finish.
Perhaps unsurprisingly, there’s more. Bob insists that it is “indisputable” that Fr. Olivieri was wrong because, he claims, the focus of the 1633 decree against Galileo was the motion of the earth:
I get back to the Bean home and start shivering - this is a bad sign.
She said: ‘Websites and hosts of user-generated comment risk becoming tactical targets for those who wish to clamp down on criticism or investigation of their activities.’
Me: “Yeah, you mean like ‘Nation’s Safest City’?”
TPC Studio "Coffee Cafe"
■ The more than 10,000 people who received ICE detainers — the first step toward possible deportation — over the three-year period included 1,054 people charged only with Class C misdemeanors, which are punishable by fines only.
If you aren't familiar with these birds, check them out online. First, they lay their eggs in some messed up places. These have decided to lay in the middle of the driveway.
You have found me if you need me.
I would add: 6) This freedom of planting will cut down on the cost of transportation and food distribution, this will save fuel and energy for other things and will begin to reverse environmental damage.
So while I felt as if I had discovered somewhere new in Corsica, I also felt completely at home. xv
By, Mert Enbiyaoglu
Most anti-trafficking organizations rescue kids, which of course is needed, but B2F works to cut off the supply line of kids—by reaching kids before the traffickers do. They do it through an awareness and prevention program that they’re testing in 5 countries right now.
and still recline and look at the blue sky
Great for holding your hair back headband style, giving you a little mystery and protecting the delicate area around your eyes from damaging UV rays. I'm partial to a large Jackie O style, or a retro cats eye, but there are so many other options to choose from. Wayfarers, Aviators or those nifty little round John Lennon types.
Caliban’s shit-stained pond ,
Sense and Sensibility, as many of you will know, is primarily focused on the lovelives of the two eldest Dashwood sisters, Elinor and Marianne. After the death of their father, they are forced into a move to pastures fresh by the stinginess of their half-brother (and the meanness of his wife...). The move takes the sober, rational Elinor away from the man her sister believes her to be engaged to, Edward Ferrars; however, for the impetuous, passionate Marianne, the change of scenery brings with it two very different suitors. Will the two sisters find love and happiness at the end of the novel?
2 attempted
The Syrian Arab role has increased on the regional and international levels over the past decades, which has led to achieving human and national aspirations and achievements in all fields and domains. Syria has occupied an important political position as it is the beating heart of Arabism, the forefront of confrontation with the Zionist enemy and the bedrock of resistance against colonial hegemony on the Arab world and its capabilities and wealth. The long struggle and sacrifices of our people for the sake of its independence, progress and national unity has paved the way for building the strong state and promoting cohesion between the people and their Syrian Arab army which is the main guarantor and protector of the homeland’s sovereignty, security, stability and territorial integrity; thus, forming the solid foundation of the people’s struggle for liberating all occupied territories.
"If the power requirements are comparable, we will still need fossil fuels to accomplish large-scale effects, just as we would through the use of technology. This implies that using magic to combat pollution might simply beget more pollution."
So here I sit, not laughing now, as I type in my pajamas..and I could do with some B12...standing together that's what they make for me.
Having managed to nick a couple of hours away from work, I got on with a few jobs. Since my last post, the weather has taken a turn for the better with sunshine and blue skies very much the order of the day today.
But the response to Simon Clark’s question (which I mentioned last night) has left me with little further doubt about the shattering effect the smoking ban has had on many people’s social lives. A sample:
it's just such a different world this time. it's every bit as rad – ahem, now that the icks are behind me – but it's just... well... different. going through it one time before hardly qualifies me as an expert but there is some comfort in having been here before... though there was a bit of bliss in the ignorance of a first pregnancy! now that i know what natural childbirth actually feels like, i do cringe from time to time knowing what's on the horizon.
For every minute you spend praying for something, you should spend two minutes thanking God for the blessing he chose to give you. So if I pray 30 minutes for God to allow your grass to grow, I should pray 60 minutes giving thanks to him and share the good news with my brothers and sisters in Christ and even with non-believers as well. It does not have to be in one sitting either. I prayed that God would make the grass seed grow, he gave me the grass and allowed my trees to be the first on my block to bloom. God gave me that miracle and I am thankful for that. We should take the time to give thanks to God for the blessing and give Him the glory instead of just saying “well it worked out for me, thank God” and then go on about our business. We should be grateful for what he has done and share what he has done for us, for His glory.
Who?: Rebecca Taylor (vocals, guitar, percussion), Charles Watson (vocals, guitar)
clerk who had waited on her last week and she said that Chris (my sister) was her last customer and
Most of the cards I make I put in a box and I will send them to the kids in Denver Childrens, Salt Lake and Seattle Hospitals. I also make and send my Uncle and his friends cards in Afganastan, lots of them want cards.
I've been ranting off-the record elsewhere, so if you absolutely must know what I rant about, drop me a line and maybe I'll send you the link (depending on whether I know you or not!:)
“It is one of the blessings of old friends that you can afford to be stupid with them.” Ralph Waldo Emerson
While whispering softly under your breath
It’s an annual tradition of my family to go to Divine Mercy Shrine at Marilao Bulacan for the station of the Cross. Divine Mercy Shrine is a great place to spend Good Friday with the family. Thank God that, that day was not as hot as last year! Here’s the photos of the stations of the cross.
Now, the year is 2041, and the investigation that began with the election of President Ryman is much bigger than anyone had assumed. With too much left to do and not much time left to do it in, the surviving staff of After the End Times must face mad scientists, zombie bears, rogue government agencies-and if there's one thing they know is true in post-zombie America, it's this:
- ½ cup ground almonds
I had some pumpkin seeds or pepitas so I toasted them with a couple of pinches of cumin and dash of salt. These are delicious all by themselves but on the soup . . . WOW.
This was a relatively small area of several hundred acres. It was opening day, and an army of hunters had the elk blocked in. They were running from one end of the wooded area to another. In short order they were overheated, gasping for air, and panting for water. The air was cold and their bodies hot; that is what produced the steam. So thick was the steam that I could not identify the elk in the great mist; I could only watch the cloud move along the forested area. It was amazing.
One end of the new wall runs under the existing bridge. The increasing height of the new wall under the old bridge is making for some tight working conditions. You can just see the planks of the existing bridge along the right edge of this picture.
I had hoped I’d be able to take some more “urban” pictures today while I was in Surry Hills. You know, in front of a brick wall or an old rusty roll-up garage door, but I forgot. And when I remembered I was at home. So you can admire our succulent plant collection, air con unit, and gas water heater instead.
Watching the shadows dance in staggers as they crawl beneath the wall.
the operation of bread
Try to alter your expectations, hopes and dreams for your children away from specific “head” topics – college, degree, marriage, money – and into looser “heart” ones, like happiness, peace, love, and passion. Because our expectations manifest themselves in ways that are visible to our children, “head” expectations are likely to push them down the path toward pre-defined traditional education choices and careers, with fewer opportunities for radically different choices. But “heart” expectations can take many guises. These types of expectations could lead them to college and corporate career, to be sure; but it is far more likely that this would be a path of their choosing as opposed to a path of convenience. It could also lead them to travel the world. It could lead them to a quiet career in the arts, or an “out loud” life doing things that we – and they – cannot even imagine yet. In other words, it can help them view their lives as ones of freedom and choice in which success is defined on their own terms and in their own time. It can help them see what it possible, rather than what is impossible or pre-ordained. And it can help them see that success when defined by the heart is more lasting and joyful than when defined by the head.
David O'Donnell ... Andy
Once a basket is filled to the level of overflowing it then receives the cute lid. The basket is then tossed to the side where it waits patiently to be transferred to the dock.
Made famous, or perhaps infamous, by the north dakota hospital next decades. In the north dakota hospital, research and loan programs available is an emerging field in North Dakota. But, with a sound understanding of several sciences, such as low-cost housing, alternative energy development, and infrastructure construction not only come to visit from early spring through the north dakota hospital of September. Tickets to races and special events. Events include; Modifieds, Stock cars, North Star Hobby, Bombers and Enduro. Special events such as ring cakes, rommegrat, lefse, and flatbread. They also hold a Hagar and Helga look alike contest and Norski talent show.
Back at the company, Seung Yeon runs into Jae Ha and he asks her if she has any money. She asks him how much it is and goes to the other M2 Junior members, asking them to help out Jae Ha by performing a gig with him. Tae Gun tells her she’s too soft hearted and they can’t help Jae Ha without permission from the company. Chang Min scoffs at her, muttering how the kid who already has a golden ticket is making a fuss about helping others. As the members are about to leave, Seung Yeon pipes up, aren’t they a team? They’re supposed to help each other, be together as a team. Chang Minruns into Team Leader Han and helps her pick up some dropped files, noticing the F grade on his own. He finds all his team members gone and guesses where they are. Meanwhile, at the shopping mall, where the gig is to be, Jae Ha prepares to perform with a single other person. He prepares to put on make up to prevent from being recognized but Seung Yeon and Ji Woo come up to him and the three prepare to perform together ‘as a team’. As they’re heading up the stage, the other four members, minus Chang Min come up.
You let me come near you, you with the broken hearts. Your wounds are fresh, tender, and exposed with road rash. I tread carefully beside you, knowing that a quick movement will send you flitting away like a frightened butterfly.
up there with you). -— All
I wonder how much it could help to be firm to our world/national/community in our beliefs, without demanding that they accept them.
Medicine, involves a 44-year-old woman observed by doctors at the University of
But thanks to an explosion of brain research we now know that it also physically impacts our gray matter.
I have to admit that I did my precursory “color head count” of the crowd. I’d love to be color-blind, but like many people who have lived in areas where there are not many others who look like them, the head count becomes an ingrained habit. Plus I have been curious about what a Vodou crowd in the Pacific Northwest would look like. So, for the record, here it is: Total of about 30-40 people. Of those people, 3 of African descent (Robert, one of the guest dancers, and a middle-aged woman), an Asian woman (whom I discovered later is a member of the same dance troupe that performed at the Fet, a group that I would like to see again, Danse Perdue) and myself. Some of the people I’ve mentioned this to are surprised that there were not more people of African descent present, but somehow I wasn’t surprised, it being the Pacific Northwest.
Two possessed men recognize Jesus.
This one was knit from the stash. A couple of skeins of alpaca that I picked up at an alpaca farm around here! The picture doesn't do it justice. It's more blue than brown. My photographer had to take this before he went to school and the lighting was poor.
Celebrating today will attract more wins for next week. You attract more of what you are grateful for. When your in line with the powers above, magic happens. Have you ever been in a state when things were just flowing, just going well, one after another? It’s at that time that your on the frequency of attraction. Anchor that at each success and you can trigger it any time you need it.
You can e-mail this information to refund@boulevard.com or mail it to “Imperial Stout Refund, Boulevard Brewing Company, 2501 Southwest Boulevard, Kansas City, MO 64108.” You should expect a check within 2-4 weeks of your submission.
If you are like the bean, when things are at their worst, you get better and change the situation around you. When the hours is the darkest and trials are their greatest do you elevate to another lever?
(The above is an illustration from the book “Gives me Hopes”. This touch my heart as i read about the janitor who go beyond his duty to mold another person’s life! Though like what we feel in our human’s mind that the janitor himself is one of the “lowest” position held in the school, but even he can touch someone’s life, make someone’s day!) Don’t you think lowly of yourself because you are capable of influencing life!
The terms “reasonable opportunity of being heard” have generated a wealth of case law. “Hearing” means that the officer concerned should be given a proper and prior notice of the allegations against him. The notice must be adequate in terms and in time.
But then I thought of who we were and what we have become. The article in the Post contains this statement: “The expanded authority will allow the CIA and JSOC to fire on targets based solely on their intelligence ‘signatures’ — patterns of behavior that are detected through signals intercepts, human sources and aerial surveillance, and that indicate the presence of an important operative or a plot against U.S. interests. Until now, the administration had allowed strikes only against known terrorist leaders who appear on secret CIA and JSOC target lists and whose location can be confirmed.”
The soundtrack was very Gothic at times, which was quite fitting with the slightly medieval setting of The Demon Kingdom and surrounding towns. Other times, it was just a typical soundtrack providing background music to those slice-of-life, humorous, and happy-go-lucky scenes. However, during those sad moments, when I told myself that I would not cry, the background music combined with the images on screen would make my tears fall.
Welcome to our May theme here at Penny Black and More and we have a very London theme going on this month to celebrate our Queens Diamond Jubilee and the upcoming Olympics which I for one am really looking forward to, it's such an honour to be hosting them in the UK. So our theme just had to be:
It both saddens and angers me to know that the Florida PD didn’t even attempt to listen to anyone but Zimmerman about what happened. They failed to properly investigate until they were forced to acknowledge that immense public scrutiny was now squarely on them. Indeed, I think had the details of this case not obtained such widespread coverage, Trayvon’s killer would still be walking free.
In a large casserole pan, begin with a layer of sauce, followed by a layer of pasta, a layer of ricotta spread, a layer of sauce. REPEAT. Repeat until to the top of the pan or until you’ve utilized all of your supply. My family and I went a little overboard and had to make an extra bit in a bread pan.
Tanner left his rifle in the rack and stepped out of the passenger side of the HMMWV with his hands raised. When he was clear of the vehicle, he slowly reached down with his left hand and removed his SIG from its holster. He carefully laid the SIG on the hood of the HMMWV.
2. The dress and bathing suit are fabulous.
Labor Signs: None and hopefully none for awhile
Since then Mister has overseen and completed the following purchases/home repairs:
- A Tips Post on How to Invent & Adapt Projects of your Own!
The Observer offered Riegelhaupt's statement. This first part isn't new:
Both the Quixote and Soldiers of Salamis are soaked in meta-fictional solutions and both are concerned with a mimesis of authenticity. The three parts of Soldiers of Salamis are, structurally, fictive write-ups: (i) the journalist’s research about an incident in the Spanish war, (ii) the novel he wrote about it, and (iii) the continuation of an "interrupted" book whose ending was initially obfuscated but later brought into focus. The conceit - the telling itself of the novel - is its own wordplay.
07. Tre Anni Fa Una Sera (02:40)
For most of his career, he has competed against the best of the second tier sprinters. And while this has given him awesome stats – lots of fast times, few loses, and high annual rankings – it hasn’t hardened him to the tough world of the sprint wars. A game where toughness and grit are as much in demand as pure speed – the qualities that win the big races. In contrast his primary competition (Maurice Greene and Justin Gatlin early, and Usain Bolt and Tyson Gay most recently) were all hardened through the rigors of competing against the best early on and taking their lumps!
I received word just the other day that my very short zombie film aftershock and the music video I made for World Collision were accepted to Bleedfest for their February 6 edition! Bleedfest, which I've blathered on about before, is a female-centric genre film festival, but more than that, their horror edition is in February which is Women in Horror month! I'm so honoured and excited to be a part of this event! Hopefully, I'll be able to go! Thank you Elisabeth and Brenda Fies!
This month I am working with the adorable Aiko collection. The Aiko collection is so beautiful with whimsical prints and the prettiest color combinations.
B.Sc. (Honours) Statistics
Tor then gave the sold out audience a brief historical backdrop to Israel’s war with Lebanon from 1982-1985. He explained the rationale for Israel’s initial incursion into Lebanon (the effort to eradicate the stepped up terrorism emanating from the PLO against northern Israel) and the problematic nature of the conflict, with Israel quickly finding itself in the quagmire of the Lebanese civil war. Tor spoke of how that war came to define his generation, and how that generation went on to come of age and produce powerful artistic testaments to that period, most notably through literature and film. Movies like Yossi and Jaeger, Beaufort, and Waltz with Bashir have all received international critical acclaim, with Beaufort and Waltz both nominated for Best Foreign Film by the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences.
Kelburn’s Derek Moore introduced his Cart Blanche. It had suffered a bit from being jugged up from the cellar and is at the lower end of an acceptable carbonation range. It does look a little drab next to the frothy lager and the opalescent wheat beer, but tastes more complex than the more approachable beers from WEST and Harviestoun. It’s enjoyable once you get used to the woody, earthy bitterness of it.
The pseudos won’t read anything.. their prejudice suffices.
Blast fat during set breaks. "I think up a move of the day and do it for one minute between each set," says Blahnik. "Explosive, plyometric moves such as jump squats or side leaps or jumping rope boost your heart rate, burn a few extra calories a minute and firm your lower body." You can burn up to about 100 extra calories a session.
"I wouldn't want to hold hands with you for the same reason.," He retorts "Oh actually I know where you've been"
Still flipping the knife, Aryc said, “I really hope you don’t feel pressured to reveal our names.” With sudden force, he threw the knife at Gunther. It struck his throat and pinned him against the wall behind the couch. His eyes glassed over. His breathing was difficult, raspy. The blade had sliced through the windpipe and was there to stay. Gunter tried to reach up and pulled the blade out, but he could not muster the strength to do so.
Either way you slice it, demons are not to be taken lightly. If you do not believe in God, they will twist your head around on your body and make you puke green stuff. If you do believe in God they will make you disobedient to God. Most importantly, they want to keep you from knowing Jesus Christ as your Savior. They want you to go to Hell. God does not.
Dry shampoo is my hero. It eliminates shine and creates volume. Only problem? When I'm applying it, I feel like I'm creating crack lines on my head. Ah well, I suppose you could look at it like hair crack -- I'm pretty addicted!
I would like to see David Laws back in government – not just because I admire him a lot and he is a close colleague and friend of mine – I just so happen to think he would be very good for the Government and good for Britain.That would be Mr Laws the self-confessed expenses thief. Wasn't there something about standards of probity in government...?
Another stunner was the miso glazed pork chops. I’ve never had miso glazed lamb (or any red meat for that matter) but I really enjoyed it.
“You just like the idea of sleeping with a woman who won’t expect anything from you afterwards,” declares one of the women in a somewhat accusatory tone. “What you don’t understand is that being penetrated by a man is unnatural for lesbians. Why would they willingly go through such an ordeal?”
3/4 cup cured black olives, pitted and drained
As she starts to dance and move we see Salome transforming into her alter self, enhanced by music, pace and fashion. Exuding female power and raw sexuality. As the momentum builds we see her transition into an alternate universe of surreal heightened energy, where her audience manifest as surreal objects and succumb to the dark powers of her triumphant, twisted and exotic dance.
Another time as we walked to the railway station to catch a train for my granddaughter's swimming lesson, once again I heard a distinctive and loud 'Ark Ark Ark'. I asked my daughter-in-law what the Japanese word was for crow. Karasu, she said. She described a story, or fable, about the crow (it was maybe Aesop's fable about a greedy crow). She explained that in Japan, crows aren't seen as endearing birds. This is due I'm sure to their scavenging habits. I said that we don't have crows in New Zealand, but that seagulls were looked upon with some disparagement too because they scavenge. She said she remembered when travelling in Europe that she was so excited to see seagulls and thought them lovely, but the locals thought she was crazy for liking them.
HCPC 3467 Woodland Growth
Despite the dominate narrative of the Arab Spring – as a collection of uprisings linked by common cause against authoritarianism in the Arab world – Tunisian public debate has been largely insulated from events elsewhere in the Arab world. While Tunisians are aware of and sympathetic toward the other uprisings – especially in Libya and Egypt – there has been little public discussion of the paths toward democracy these countries have taken. Tunisians rightly see their path as a model to follow – rather than the violent and chaotic paths followed by their neighbors.
Instructions: Make card from kraft cardstock and round the bottom corners. Cut a block of pink grid paper, round the bottom corners and adhere. Cut a strip of grey dotted paper, and adhere to the top of the pink grid block. Adhere trims to the top of the paper block. Cut a block of pink lined paper and stamp the sentiment to it. Adhere below the trims, on top of the pink grid paper. Cut the "smile" strip from patterned paper, and adhere to the right of the sentiment. Tie a double bow from pink twine, adhere to the trim and top with a wooden button. Punch confetti pieces from patterned paper, and adhere to the top and bottom in a scattered pattern. Add pink pearls randomly into the confetti to finish.
I know that's over a year away, and that seems like forever. The reason it's so distant is pretty simple: I need more time to write and edit and polish it, so that when you get it, it's the best book 3 I could possibly make it. The last thing I want is to feel like the last book in the trilogy needed just a little more time, and I'm sure you feel the same way, even if internally you are saying "OMG WHY ARE YOU DOING THIS TO US, CRUEL AUTHOR?!"
I'll try harder. And just for good measure...
It is the last week of the semester, and work has been piling up on my desk. I love teaching, and am very happy I am only teaching one course this term. I’m also increasingly jealous of our cat.
Who is the angel of the Lord? It is the same one who called unto him out of that bush. “God called unto him out of the bush.” Here, He is called “Lord” for in verse 7 it says, “and the Lord said, I have surely seen the affliction of my people.” In Exodus God is called “Lord” and in Acts 9 Jesus Christ is called “Lord.” Furthermore we have already seen that in Acts 9 Jesus Christ is also the “God of our Fathers.” I conclude that the One who called Moses was the same one Who called and chose Saul to be the apostle of the Gentiles.
19And that he will make you high over all the nations he has made, in praise, in name, and in honour, and that you are to be a holy people to the Lord your God as he has said.
6) Roll each piece into a 7"- to 8"-circle (a rolling pin helps here), and dry-fry them (fry without oil) over medium heat for about 1 minute per side, until they're puffed and flecked with brown spots. Adjust the heat if they seem to be cooking either too quickly, or too slowly; cooking too quickly means they may be raw in the center, while too slowly will dry them out.
Story blurb: River Thieves is a beautifully written and compelling novel that breathes life into the pivotal events which shaped relations between the Beothuk Indians of Newfoundland and European settlers. Following a series of expeditions made under the order of the British Crown, the reader witnesses the tragic fallout from these missions as the Beothuk vanish and the web of secrets guarded by the settlers slowly begin to unravel …Told in elegant sensual prose this is an enthralling historical novel of great passion and suspense, driven by the extraordinary cast of characters. And with it Michael Crummey establishes himself as one of Canada’s most exciting new talents.
This conversation took many years, by the end of which time the old earth priest was very tired and hungry and returned to the temple and wrote the words of the old warrior stone in a book on such matters which can be found in the temple library to this day.
With primary or shared responsibility for areas such as sales management, product development, distribution channel management, marketing communications (including advertising and promotions), pricing, market research, and customer service, CMOs are faced with a diverse range of specialized disciplines in which they are required to be knowledgeable. This challenge is compounded by the fact that the day-to-day activities of these functions, which range from the highly analytical (e.g. – pricing and market research) to highly creative (advertising and promotions), are carried out by subordinates possessing learning and cognitive styles to which the CMO must adapt his or her own leadership style.
I built a big loop and went in the corral,
His young son had just been arrested and charged with having sex with his under age girlfriend-----as young couples are inclined to do.
The research is based on a claimed similarity between the way we recognize sexy images of women and objects.
‘Instead of bringing all the wrong attention to our brand and country, why not start supporting our ambassador, building her up and praying that she impacts the world with her story?
Already in the first quarter of the second century, Ignatius fought two main opponents: legalistic Jews and Gnostics. Both had heretical views of Jesus. Litfin writes, “Both of these christological errors had harmful consequences: they located salvation somewhere other than the cross” (p. 45). Faulty christology has not been extinguished today, and the discerning Christian will detect where legalism and Gnosticism still rear their ugly heads. Ignatius is proof that theological battles can be fought on multiple fronts. Moreover, Ignatius reminds Christians to cling to the cross if they are zealous to authentically live out their faith. As Litfin says, “Understanding the doctrine of grace inevitably yields gracious people” (p. 46).
I'll post a v-blog tomorrow to celebrate!
We came home that night with a 1/4 lb. each of Jagdwurst (a spicy beef and pork sausage that resembles a firm liverwurst with larger meat bits) and Sülze (a vinegary/mustard seed-y headcheese made with beef tongue). We got a half pound of cooked beef salami too (Scott isn't as "German" as I am for the cured meats). Tonight, I really just wanted a sandwich for dinner. I toasted some Bavarian rye and smeared it with homemade sandwich spread (mayo mixed with minced green tomato/shallot pickle), some spicy brown mustard, greenleaf lettuce, a few slices of sharp cheddar and layers of cured meats.
16. Our good friends are moving to Owasso this weekend. yippee!! Look out Owasso....here comes Parry...oh, no!!!!
Rollin’ into Baghdad wonderin’ how he got this far
· slices (wedges) of hard-cooked eggs (see recipe)
“More than 20 law enforcement officers are on scene today investigating extensive property damage to approximately 20 classrooms. Our preliminary investigation indicates individuals entered the building and caused vandalism to classrooms and removed electronics. The Sheriff’s Office was notified by the Orangeburg Department of Public Safety after they responded to a fire alarm at 3:31 a.m.,” Sheriff Leroy Ravenell said in a press release.
Because that’s how I am feeling right now.
The photo on the left shows the rose coloring that the older flowers can acquire, while on the right is one that is all yellow.
So this trip to the art store — and my sketch pad, pencils, and erasers that I purchased there — got me thinking. I have spent a good portion of my life wanting to take art lessons, but have always balked at them. My last semester of college, I had the choice to take the introductory art class or to take more writing. I chose writing (and, honestly, regretted it).
Cooking time about one hour and forty-five minutes, depending on oven temperature accuracy and size of the turkey breast. The size of this split-turkey breast is 2.58 ounces and will serve six to eight people if serving about 4 ounces per person. (or cook and freeze small portions for fewer numbers of people eating.)
We often post about brands we admire, many you have heard of. This next one could be the exception — unless you’re in the film/video industry, that is. Among these folks, the mention of a RED camera brings any discussion to a different level. Here’s why.
Slaughterhouse-Five
So if you skin begins to change color from it’s norm, you are damaging your skin and even damaging it a little can have dire consequences. On the superficial side, excessive tanning (or even a little) causes your skin to break down prematurely. You’re going to get wrinkles and the skin is going to start to sag. You know that weathered leather look? Well that’s never attractive and it’s what you’re going to look like if you keep up with the tanning. The collagen and elasticity are going to break down and that’s the stuff that keeps you skin looking tight, firm, and young. Oh and don’t forget about the unsightly brown spots you’re going to get.
Should I have just gone for it? I'm starting to regret not buying it. If you live near Bellingham, Washington, hop in your car right now and go buy it! She deserves a good home. Here's a fixture I found online that looks VERY similar.
WE'RE CHANGING THE WORLD ... ONE CHALLENGE AT A TIME!
When I was in Texas, my Mama had to figure out a way for me to eat steak, seeing as how it is sacrilegious to visit Cowtown, USA and not have one.
Also, Barry Bostwick and Meat Loaf are getting pretty old.
Q.: To start with, could you tell me a little bit about yourself and So Shelly?
Each such bundle/trust has a Cut Off Date identified in the trust documents (specifically, in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement). The Cut Off Date is the date on which all mortgage loans in the trust must be identified. In short, a final list of all of the mortgages in the bundle is set out. Each trust also has a Closing Date which is the date that the individual mortgages are transferred to the Trust Custodian, who must certify that for each mortgage, the custodian has a mortgage note endorsed in blank and proof that the ownership of the note has been transferred. This proof is most often an Assignment of Mortgage. Most trusts included the following or equivalent language regarding the Assignments:
D: Santa is real St. Nickolas was born in Turkey and he did exist. He did make toys and give them to children and this is the character (in Holland known as Sinter Klaus) that Santa Claus is built off of. Another thing is you are all arguing as if Science and Religion cannot go together the truth is is only in recent years have people seen science this way. Back during the renaissance science was begun to try and understand how god works not try to disprove existence. Another thing is that a being of massive power such as the god of abraham could do something in 7 of HIS days not ours. Stephen Hawkings has proven that discrepancies in time exist. In fact if you were to go at the speed of light one week could easily become thousands and thousands of years. This discrepancy is shown by a plane’s clock slowly getting ahead of a clock on the ground.
You can massage the answer as you go, she adds: “Often once you get started, the rest of the answer flows.”
TCM Night at the Movies: Merry Christmas! (2011) ... TCM ... 8 PM
Still, being me I had to check out the bookstores. Since Ann Arbor is the home of Borders, I visited that and a couple more. (Can’t stay away from the biz!) Next time I go back, I will make sure to turn our clients’ books so that they face forward on the shelves.
look on your face whenever you listen to it.
The A&A event on Thursday 24 May is now fully booked.
i think i am worn out from the hanging of all that STUFF.
This is going to be a series of posts about what I think are important things for transpeople to think about. These are the lessons I had to learn, the things that let me be who I am now. If you find them useful, please let me know.
The thing is, when we have gone grocery shopping together, my husband and I both have given the kids small lists of 2 or 3 items that they go off and find themselves, and then bring back to our cart. They have not once gotten lost in doing so. I have not forced them to do this either; it’s something they both want to do. They like being given the freedom to choose which bananas, or which loaf of bread, we buy that day. We have allowed them to do this as a way of giving a bit of independence in small doses, in a low-risk setting. All of these facts combined played a part in the comfort level I felt about allowing my son to buy a gallon of milk, alone.
I haven't set a weight goal. My BIG goal isn't a number or size. It's a hike :)
11:32 - your dinner date explains that you need the check and you will be paying by card.
Hence this week's JNSQ FF: What's your worst neighbor story? Time to vent. Let the anger spill out of you like water from of Niagra falls.
My father also “grabbed a cape.” He invested in the lives of students by setting aside and raising “seed money” to help educate students that otherwise couldn’t afford that opportunity. In 1985, my parents flew to Rio de Janeiro to spend Christmas with me. At that time I was earning a Master’s Degree in International Business at The University of South Caroline and was assigned to work at an international company in Rio as an intern. My father was president of Palm Beach Atlantic University (then college). During brunch, my father started a conversation with Edson who was waiting tables. Edson had grown up in a favela, or rather one of the shanty towns made of cardboard houses on the hills of Rio. A few days later, my dad offered Edson a full scholarship to Palm Beach Atlantic University. However, my father told Edson that he must pay his own way to get to Florida. My father knew the importance of a student personally investing in his/her own future to ensure commitment. After a few years, Edson raised enough money to get to Florida and not only attended undergraduate school at PBAU but also earned an MBA there. After a successful career, Edson returned to Rio where he now helps educate children living in the favelas. Education truly levels the playing field and empowers children with hope for a future. Learn more about that here.
So I plunged my fingers in Skully's mouth. Not being nearly as dexterous as I was when I was younger I hoped and prayed I could quickly grab the jerky and get it out.
From the public's point of view, oil prices this high have become a "normal" part of life. And, if Skrebowski's analysis proves correct, there will be no dramatic price spikes above, say, $200 a barrel that stick, something that might definitively signal the beginning of a long-term oil crisis in the public's mind. Instead, there will be repeated attempts to revive economic activity through fiscal and monetary stimulus which will ultimately fail to gain traction as oil prices shoot up once again, dampen economic activity and lead to recession after recession. During each recession oil prices will drop making the peak oil problem seem to disappear.
The last time, he said, was in the 1930s, when then-Gov. Olin Johnston demanded the resignation of the State Highway Commission, which refused, prompting the governor to call out the state militia to surround the agency.
In this way, I’ve got a recessed LED light, installed, for $20. Quite a lot less than the kit price at HD.
Delingpole goes on:
This next creative space comes to us from sunny California. Today's creative space belongs to Peri. Not only is she my sister, but she is a constant source of amusement and encouragement to those around her. She is a multi-talented artist, in that she creates in many different mediums. She does beautiful fine art portraits in oils...yep, that's me, can you believe how spot on this is? I'm blown away!
I really identify with weeds.
Final Thoughts: Philosophy, Ethics, and SR
Chaitezvi was a good chief and all the people liked him. When he was given the chieftainship of Chinamora, Nehambakamba said, “I must be the chief.” The people of Chinamora’s house replied to him, “When we were fighting against the vaRozvi you did not help us so you are not the one who is to become the chief.”. Kapungumbere and Musuwani also wanted to become chiefs but the sons of Chinamora did not agree because at the time when Chinamora was fighting against Ditoti they did not help him. They said that he was their father-in-law. Then after that Musuwani, Nehambakamba, Paingarire, Kapungumbere, Wambe and Rusere were told that they and their children would never become chiefs because they did not help when they were fighting against the vaRozvi.
There will be a revolution someday in this country. The corruption of our political institutions seems so entrenched and our leaders so hopelessly sold-out. Some more than others, but all are beholden to the Big Money. I was reading yesterday about boom towns out West, and how people without jobs or skills are flocking to places like Montana and Wyoming to work for Halliburton and other companies involved in fracking. Funny word, that. Especially to a geek like me who can’t help but associate it with Battlestar Galactica and its use there as a substitute for “fucking”. Because yeah, we’re busy fracking everything up.
Lorraine is a very small wine producing area in north east France, just slightly west of Alsace and centered around Metz and Nancy. Today the place barely shows up on our radar as a wine producer, but once upon a time vines flourished here. Before Appellation crontrôlée regulations much of the grapes for Champagne came from this area. Phylloxerra arrived here much later than Champagne, so it was of huge benefit to have this source of grapes – ‘Champagne’ grapes were also grown in Luxembourg in those more relaxed days. After 1871 Lorraine became a part of the German Empire, until 1918, and the grape growers of Lorraine became suppliers to the fledgling Sekt industry.
“Two-wheel travel is a superb way to explore everything our cultural campus has to offer, and the rich landscape of Prospect Park,” said HOB Director Ellen F. Salpeter. “We are thrilled to welcome Bike and Roll to Grand Army Plaza.”
‘Why should I trust you?’ My voice is barely audible but I know he can hear it.
Let’s look at the exact passage in scripture:
Cyril Osborne Conservative(Louth) began his campaign against immigration in 1954. The open entry to anyone was not brought under any control until the Commonwealth Immigration bill (1961).At the second reading Osborne warned “that the world’s poor would swarm to Britain’s welfare honey pot. We have neither the room nor the resources to take all who would like to come.” We are seeing this now with boats leaving Africa for Europe. In March 1965 he told the House,”Our children and grandchildren will curse us for our moral cowardice.”
Miss Garner, who was taken to hospital for treatment of the dog’s defensive bite, was also charged with underage drinking. She was released on $3,000 bond.
Designer Paper: Paper Co. textured, Gold textured
The Kansas race also marked the return of Kasey Khane (hopefully). A solid top-ten run for this guys is what they needed to stop the bleeding. Let’s hope this showing was not a fluke.
Friends of mine are using diet plans such as Weight Watchers and the Atkins Diet. I think this is a great idea because the ‘plans’ have things already picked out.
There world has been coming to an end since 1956.
If you read this blog you already know my love of pickled vegetables and
Umeboshi Plums
If you could go back and give your 19-year old self a wise piece of advice, what would it be?
And yes, I am smiling, among other things.
Person Living or Dead That They Most Want to Meet: Elvis
Served with LTD 4-A Limited Edition Lager
It was a rainy day in Portland but we headed to Mt. Hood anyway. If I’d kept waiting for another sunny day, we wouldn’t have gone. My friend Star Waters was joining Bonnie Johnson and me on the day’s adventure so we headed north across the Columbia River, crossing the two-mile long Glenn L. Jackson Memorial Bridge to Vancouver, WA to pick her up. I loved the idea of that because it gave me the opportunity for a Facebook check-in in the state of Washington.
For Summer and me, it was really special because we are adopting a child from an Ethiopian orphanage. It was emotional to walk through the orphanage and think, ‘My own son will be coming from a place like this.’
Dappled in sunshine, words robbed of their meaning, being quaint and all. But it was ever so lovely out today, I could hardly stand it.
It was all amazing. The staff was so helpful and friendly, giving us samples of beer and cheese to try, helping us find exactly what we wanted. We went home with 2 little wrapped bundles of deliciousness--one a sheep's milk from Italy that fit Jesse's wish of "something pungent," and another a creamy goat's milk that will balance the pungent one perfectly! They are safely wrapped in paper, chilling out in our fridge until a later time.
So once again, from my heart to yours...
It’s now the year 2000 and there’s a new Diablo game on the shelves. The sequel sees the avatar from the original title overcome by the eternally corrupting influence of evil. You see Blizzard has cleverly wrong-footed players of the original title: using any kind of demonic magic without reading the instruction manual first is highly ill-advised. If you want to blame anyone, and I do, fault should be laid at the feet of smug old Deckard Cain, who probably saw all this coming but wanted to keep his corner of the Identify Magic Items market for himself.
And then, a garden. He wasn’t there anymore. Instead, I found a pretty patch of the brightest flowers I have ever seen. Daisies. Baby Gerber daisies in the brightest shades of pink, purple, and orange. The sun was beginning to set because the way it shun on the flowers announced the end of a day.
Shoes: Nicholas Kirkwood
They did “Shadrach” a few times and we screamed until we were hoarse, and avoided the crowd surfers and stage divers, and then they did a few other songs. And then they ran off, and it was over. Though we debated trying to get backstage (as die-hard groupies should), we instead basked in the magic and went to DuPar’s and went over every last detail of every last second of the night. And then all there was left to do was wait for our MTV debut.
There is only one rose bloom in my garden that still possesses color. Well, I fudged a little on that statement. It’s not in the garden. It’s on my screened porch, having been protected under a tarp with a lamp for heat. It’s a ‘Red Drift’ rose.
By seeing the gold
Prague. Provence. Paris.
It’s hard work but very rewarding and I would very much enjoy another four years representing New Brighton, the town where I live and love.
Once she'd managed to gently coax his bladder to work she decided to carry out a quick urine test. Thankfully although a very few spots of blood were found to be present everything else was clear.
And when they had seen it, they made known abroad the saying which was told them concerning this child.
But who is she?
8:30 – Panda Riot, Midstates, The Twees, Daniel Klag @ Lit $6 (21+)
Jack-"Then how are you here right now?"
The dog completed his business efficiently; we came back inside; I reentered the kitchen, reached for my coffee cup, and…alas! For some reason unbeknown to me, the coffeemaker hadn’t actually started. Fine; Monday is the day I usually go into work a bit later. I wasn’t in a rush, so refusing to be frazzled, I reset the machine, checked the water, and wandered back into the bedroom to check my e-mail while my fresh, fragrant elixir of consciousness brewed. I sifted through my mail until I heard the percolation process winding down. I retrieved my mug, added cream and sugar, took my first much-anticipated sip and…*splutter*. Horror of horrors! I was sipping boiling water laced with cream and sugar. Note to self: when making coffee, the desired result is usually best obtained if you actually add the…coffee! I was now approaching half an hour of being mobile and semi-conscious without caffeine. My limit is usually somewhere around ten minutes, and this is on an exceptionally slow day. So: dump the mess in the sink; reset the coffeemaker; lather, rinse, repeat. They say third time’s the charm, and thankfully that statistic proved accurate in this case, as I was fast-approaching under caffeinated, premenstrual, homicidal psychobitch.
not because of my abilities,
Place another piece of glass on top of each glass strip. You can use a drop of glass fusing glue to hold the beads in place while you place the glass into the kiln (and while firing), but be sure to allow the glue to dry before firing. Fire the beads in your glass fusing kiln until fully fused.
This is going to sound awful, but I have long felt that kids' birthday parties are an especially acute form of torture.
I am going to be there in both an official and a buying armloads of books that I'm not entirely sure where I will put when I get home capacity on Saturday. In my official capacity I will be at the Community Services Center table helping to sell our range of fabulous publications and provide resources and information for the International Community in Taiwan. Hopefully I will be able to get sufficient time in my second capacity to have a look around, take a few photos, check out a few books and report back here once the event is over. If you're in Taipei that weekend I might see you there!
First the court has to decide on the legality of last year’s parliament decision of annulling four war crime cases concerning atrocities allegedly committed by former ethnic Albanian rebels during the 2001 armed conflict.
1 pound pasta
It's hard. It was rough for both of us. I am honestly still reeling at how crazy he got and how quickly over something so little. We got through it. He de-escalated with the help of the on-call crisis therapist. We watched some tv together and he went to bed. We survived. But I am still feeling crazy. Like my reality is so far removed from the rest of the planet, I am so surrounded by crazy I have absolutely no idea what "OK" is any more.
I don't like Brew Dog.
Very simple, my thoughts are that to grow a plant and not know how to save it's seed is a missed opportunity to take part in that plants full life process. More than that I believe it is our right and responsibility to do so or at least, and most importantly, to have some inkling of how to do so in order to maintain our subsistence pattern lifestyle and be able to share the knowledge with future generations. I also have no wish to be under the control of the system. The system being big agribusiness with its rules, regulations and control (GMO), or at the whim of seed companies that may be out of stock, and of course I have some worries over the future availability of non-hybrid seed coupled with the ever increasing expense of it all.
1/2 c oatmeal
I spread some Creme Brie L’Extra on some Carr’s Table Water Crackers.
Oh, and if you’re wondering why these pictures, which appear to have nothing to do with the content of this post, were chosen, it’s because they were hilarious, and nothing more. I asked the kids to smile nicely for a picture, and this is what I got.
A transformation like a fairy tale
it's nice to hear the Sparkle song too. just click at 'The Song' =)
Edit:
WordPress.org
his legs be of azure
Here's a simple and nourishing facial recipe to enjoy, with ingredients you probably have at home already.
Just watch as the Arctic Fox and her PAC do exactly what they did in 2010 - hunt down the opposition and get Tea Party friendly conservatives into Congress.
I guess whatever she said made me feel that I would offend them or make things worse if I bothered them by offering my help, and so I decided trying to avoid being seen by them; I could not reach my apartment without them seeing me, and so I went through a door in the hallway that led to a gym with a basketball court & maybe a stage, that was a bit like the gym at the D Junior High School.
Who decided to follow Him regardless of how hard it was, because she wanted to live a life of radical obedience? This sister.
I made a schedule to capture 5 minutes of recorded RF, at the start of each of the published timeslots for Cullercoats and Malin Head, as well as Niton and Portpatrick for a full 24 hour period. Not satisfied with 30 recordings to pore over, I next repeated the exercise recording 5 minutes of RF, for 24 hours, on all the timeslots of Torshavn, Orlandet and Rogaland. Even this wasn't enough, and I did another 24 hours worth of recordings, 5 minutes each on the timeslots of Cullercoats, Malin Head, Portpatrick, Niton, Torshavn, Orlandet and Rogaland. I lost count of the number of recordings I now had collected, I think it's 96...
So tell me, did Santa come early or do you have to wait until Christmas? I would also LOVE to hear what's on your Christmas list this year!
1. Go to page 77 of your current MS/WIP
Last week, I was back in Santa Rosa, the Monkey People have changed again, this time Claire Sheller and Mackenzie Bergstrom took me to meet the monkeys.
More news to follow - I'll report on the West coast riders after the SASO events this coming weekend.
Meantime I join with Sir Robin Bogg in urging all to join the campaigns for NotoNotoAV and NotoYestoAV until both the NotoAV and YestoAV campaigns get much better – but will reserve the right to begin a NotoNotoNotoAv and NotoNottoYestoAV campaign if either falls below the appropriate standard.
for the Chicken:
The email was sent to an email address I haven't used in over a year, so it couldn't have been someone contacting me via my own blog, as my address there is current.
It's been four years now since I signed the deal on my last book, Hops & Glory. That’s so long ago, I had only written three entries on this blog at the time, and most current UK beer blogs were still twinkles in a beer geek’s eye.
The droplet on my nose wobbled
As would be Murphy's Law, shortly before closing down at camp for brunch a report came in that the Mafikizolo Pride had been found. With absolutely no time available and miles from the area both Andrea and myself could not respond but Robin was nearby and he headed in their direction. Herold being on his last drive before leave and with his guests not having seen Lion he had no option but to go, even if it did cost him his life at the hands of the kitchen staff. Closing down we hoped that the Lions would still be around in the afternoon. It was only much later that we learnt that neither Robin or Herold got to see the Lions as they had moved off into a very thick area and disappeared. It's going to be back to the drawing board for this
Staring at her, from the path, were two animals. One was a squirrel. But a squirrel unlike any that Alice had ever seen before. This, she thought, must be the king of all its kind. It was larger than most, and its coat was of the most beautiful looking fur Alice had ever seen. It, like the trees, seemed to have a glow emanating from it, which gave it the combined and total look of splendour.
We strolled around the yard and I had to come to the hard reality that I would never be able to come back. This family home would no longer belong to our family.
Blackthorn hedges are just about in full bloom now, with their distinctive white flowers appearing before the leaves come out. Normally I'd expect to see them in full bloom in March so it seems a little late.
Anyway, we're off.
I am grateful that I can still cry a good cry when I need to, and still laugh a good laugh when I want to. Emotions are proof that we're paying attention.
Being a Southerner in a major city has made me acutely aware of what I appreciate about my heritage, and those qualities I loathe about it. When I moved to the DC metro area 5 years ago, folks knew immediately that I wasn’t from around here. I learned quickly that the ease of my smile was welcomed precisely because warmth is an unfamiliar character trait around these parts. Likewise, the first time I visited New York a few years ago, I thanked a man for information and he called me back over to where he was standing to ask where I was from. When I told him I hailed from the great state of Alabama, he said to his comrades, “Told ya she wasn’t from here.”
4 peeled carrots
I am excited to tell you about this card that I created for the Spellbinders (video and tutorial can be found on the SB Blog.) This verse is a special one to me because it's my life verse. What that means to me is that it became special to me at a very young age. As a little girl, I understood the importance of it. I understood that it's important to be strong and confident but I also knew that to try and do it on my own strength alone will not get me where I need to be. Time and time again it proved so true, the days and the weeks that I took time to pray and study God's word, the more equipped I was to face life's challenges.
CFR Director Richard Holbrooke is a member of the Jesuit-controlled
Why is it that almost no prosecutors are disciplined for procedural errors or withholding evidence?
“It’s time to go to warp speed…it’s time to boldly go….”
I am not sure what the appeal is of a Dutch Bike Shop but whatever it is, the business seems to be a success as it has been here as long as we have been visiting Littlehampton. For us, it marked decision time: what should we do next?
A little Madness and Insanity
If you love your man at all, avoid high heels especially the red ones. No man wants his wife to look like a horse. It is not only embarrassing but disgraceful. Allow your man to go out for his beer or traditional Busaa or Chang’aa with his friends or to go watch football at the local shopping centre and wait for him at home with a jug of brown sour millet porridge.
For all the wrong reasons
ACL moody theater
“The point is that most members of your administration probably would be frank and characterize themselves — and upfront — as being pro-choice for abortion,” he said, “but you’re really anti-choice on every other consumer item.”
“You’re the one who stopped in the first place,” the kid mumbled. I ignored him. When Jal sulked, he looked even younger than his thirteen years. Too young and he’d attract the Baron’s attention, something I’d managed to prevent for a long time.
Gracey invited her readers to join the party by sending in a picture of themselves in a prom dress. Of course, that's an offer I couldn't refuse! So I hightailed it to my favorite thrift store. Luckily they had a pretty prom dress that looks vintage. It cost only $12 so I snapped it up. Here's what it looks like.
Next, Michelle took me into the large dog kennel area. After explaining some rules for handling the large dogs, I met Lulu. What a sweetheart! The dogs love it when they get extra time outside, so Lulu was happy for another opportunity to go out. There are large fenced in runs that enable the bigger dogs to run free and without a leash. Michelle showed me the proper procedures, and Lulu quickly began to show her personality! In the 15 minutes or so I spent with Lulu, she showed off her ability to jump up on the visitor’s bench inside the run and to sit proudly at attention. She also taught me that she liked being scratched under the chin, was very much a “people pet”, and would fetch a ball. And she had a gorgeous face!
I enjoyed the opportunity to try out the Private Selection brand of frozen foods and will likely use them again.
I'm also toying with water chemistry a touch. 15 ltrs R/O water mixed with 9 ltrs filtered Austin water treated with 1/4 campden tablet to remove chloramines. Take 12 ltrs to steep and add 1/2 tsp Calcium Chloride and 1/2 tsp Phosphoric Acid to this steeping water only.
During my liver drowning evening I must have decided to take a few notes, possibly for future blogs or just in case I didn't wake up the next morning.
Don't you allow it, either.
Last month my fellow authors and I were on a Google Hangout discussing possible topics for this month. We reviewed over 20 topics and unanimously choose this month to be the month to talk about going green and sustainability. I’m far from an expert on this topic so I decided to seek out someone who is. One of my readers is very active in alternative energy research, recycling, and conservation. He graciously invited me to his home for an interview. He gave me a tour, showed me a variety of environmentally safe products, and discussed with me his passion in the areas of sustainability. I left his home with some incredible information and some very valuable insight.
8.) Can you keep a secret?
The cat followed him as DJ wandered the apartment. Two bedrooms and two baths. To free up space, she had a small television screen mounted on the wall. She’d then surrounded it with pictures of her family. DJ recognized the center most place of honor in the grouping and felt a sentimental tug at the realization the picture was of her father. Attired in the dress uniform at the time, he smiled for the camera. His hair was the same color as Meg’s. Some hue between brown and red.
End of my first lesson. Looking back, I suppose each time he gave me the controls, the grace period between fine and wonky got a little longer.
For a full 24 hours each April 30, the country explodes in a burst of orange merriment, free concerts and flea markets to celebrate the Queen’s birthday. It’s madness.
Stamping Plate: cheetah print from Fauxnad m57
This story is character centric rather than based on a plot. It revolves around Gopi (Gopal) who is portrayed as person with mixed characters. Don’t we all have the same? A clean side and a darker one?
At first, it was TERRIFYING. It still is some moments.
“No, madam.”
Forecaster of Fate, Prophetess of the Paranormal, Seer of the Supernatural, Assessor of the Astral Plane
From her questionnaire at the Los Angeles Review of Books:
Preheat the oven to 180 degress C. Line, grease and flour an 8 inch cake pan.
We all know we should eat more vegetables. But how, how do we do that, really? What real-life tips and ideas work? How can we build our lives around the healthiest of all foods, vegetables?
David Books
2. Everyone wants to chew on the new toys until it is broken. Dogs love to play with new toys until they are un-stuffed and shredded. Just give a group of dogs a fuzzy stuffed toy and check back in a few weeks to see if you can find the parts of the stuffed toy. This is the same thing with social media tools. Today, Twitter is big. It is so popular that it fail whales frequently. Everyone wants to play with Twitter, and now we've broken it. Tweets have gone missing. Twitter search is a joke. While the Twitter toy has lasted a couple of years so far, how much longer under social media gets a new toy? Other examples of broken toys include the iphone. AT&T's network (especially in San Francisco and Austin) just can't support iphone users anymore. Looks like the HTC Evo 4G is the new toy.
14:30 – Kokusai Street
So, in an effort to dig back into the shallow blogging world here's some sweet gifts I received,
Due to the aforementioned emotional masks, we don’t quite get to know any of the characters as well as we might like in this first installment, but we certainly know enough about them and the gritty, steampunk world to find ourselves drawn in and invested in the story’s outcome. While there is no jaw-dropping, hair-pulling cliffhanger, things are left unresolved and quite literally up in the air as a new and more ghastly plague known as the Red Death begins its gruesome attack on an already frightfully thin human population. Based on the conclusion of this first installment, this series promises to get darker and more complex as it goes, and I for one will be counting the days until I’m able to again try my hand at deciphering Ms. Griffin’s deliciously wicked games of duplicity and betrayal.
Are you typically on location for the filming or mostly in the editing room afterwards?
Copic Colours Used
** In addition to these legal definitions, some describing styles also exist. Although they have a meaning that is generally understood by a relatively wide audience, this understanding is by no means unanimous and controversy surrounds some of them.
(b) does “selection or arrangement” include adding important significance to a pre-existing item of data (as in fixing the date of a football match);
If you give up when it’s winter, you will miss the promise of your spring, the beauty of your summer, fulfillment of your fall.
Also, as zombie-SOPA rises from the dead in the form of CISPA, we at ZombieLaw hope Representative Polis will be aggressive in fighting CISPA too.
That can be one hella embarrassment when your Dad is a perfectionist, especially in his field of construction. Any other dad would have no idea, but mine really knows his stuff when it comes to the tools of any trade.
The world was gray, as it always had been.
RT @AvitalLeibovich: Since the beginning of 2012, an average of a rocket a day was launched from #Gaza into #israel. #terror #hamas RT @AvitalLeibovich: In past hour and a half:6 rockets were launched from #Gaza into #israel. No injuries or damage. #terror #hamas @TANNKA_jp thanks for your continuous support. Nice shooting
He's set to start kindergarten in the fall and I fear he won't be potty trained and then what? There aren't many thing that can break me....but this? This has!
This should be quite interesting. One because the race has virtually been non existent since the mid 70’s when the book was closed on yard marks and the metric system (and records) became the standard. Ironically it was approximately the same time that automatic timing started becoming the standard, so that most 100 yard marks were hand timed with auto timing being implemented only on rare occasions. As such the accepted (legal) record for 100 yards was 9.0 sec. Set first by Ivory Crockett in 1974 and later tied by high school star Houston McTear in 1975. After 1976 the event stopped being run in all but high school meets – and by 1980 was discontinued at that level as well.
The tide is turning; it turns slowly, but it turns.
I can’t understand …. I can be quite obtuse at times I know, but for me the dalil (proofs) of having to put the headscarf are so many so why can’t we women still accept it easily? Why still an issue?
In the Summer of 2009 I thought helicopters were landing in Prospect Park . It turned out they were using a half a dozen giant fans to blow the duckweed off the lake so they could film A Couple of Dicks. That movie was renamed and released as Cop Out with Bruce Willis, Tracy Morgan. Noboday Saw it. But I can tell you with confidence that they filmed on July 1st 2009 in Prospect Park because I documented it here.
Mix salt with flour. Toss egg lightly through flour with fork until small crumbs form. Stir into one quart scalded whole milk. Bring to a boil and serve at once.
May you ponder a good question today!
That's it for my sweet little project tonight. Hope you enjoyed your visit.
Anyway, that day I committed the cardinal sin of having no cash whatsoever, and had to pay for my $2.26 coffee with debit. SHAME. Just as I pulled out my card to pay though, the lovely older man behind me (who I noted was not dressed in the standard skinny suit, half windsor/half inferiority complex, but rather jeans and a sweatshirt) stopped me in my tracks and handed the barista a $20, saying – “just put hers on mine”.
Then, I thought to myself, “What if my future employers googled my name and discovered my blog this time? It’s quite pointless to have a portfolio and a blog separately when they are going to find them eventually!”
calling. Grace, the heroine of the story, thinks that she's psychic. Assailed by strange visions from a young age, she was diagnosed with a mental disorder and abandoned by her troubled parents to an institution and then to the foster care system. Now that she’s an adult and even though she’s learned to control her gift to some extent, she hides it. That secret and her own insecurities keep her from forming close relationships.
Sleep deprived bloggers need to know!
There are also those who would have us say that there is no god but their god and foreigner from the desert is his prophet. We were told that we must accept his beliefs as truth or die. How can their great god be called “the most compassionate” and “the most merciful” when he would sanction the destruction and abandonment of our way of life, our language and customs? How could equality of all men be preached but at the same time carry our young men and women off to slavery in the east?
Zain and I made some rainbow cupcakes....The leprechaun and his rainbow :o)
The hard part,
The Charlotte hair clip comes with a plush velvet flower with a gemstone center. You can choose from several colors to match your baby’s outdoor outfit — black, light blue, olive, lavender, shocking pink, red, white, pink, and navy.
"You should..."
This beautiful image of the watering can and flowers, is from the Happy Birthday Set from Our Daily Bread Designs. I colored the image with my Prismacolor Pencils and mineral spirits. (Wow, how I LOVE to color!) This is the first time I've used set, I had it in my head that I wanted to do a card with purples and yellow...nice and spring-like and I thought this set would be perfect! The white lace and trim on the inside are from my RAK package I received from Sabrina :-D. I LOVE yellow and white together!
‘Did you tell her all that?’ I felt his desperation wash over me.
flash like charms upon still water.
Create therapeutic materials.
When the news arrives;
Describing oysters is akin to describing wine. Like wine (and unlike foods that require greater mastication), the pleasure of an oyster in your mouth is fleeting and complex, requiring your full concentration to discern the various flavours. Begin with the scent — a platter of shucked-in-front-of-you oysters is the freshest food imaginable, smelling deliciously and mouth-wateringly of cold sea air, immediately stimulating to the appetite. As you bring the shell to your lips, in the nanosecond before the slurp, that clean fresh scent fills your mouth and prepares it for the silky, plump mouthful to follow. Eaten on its own, or perhaps with the tiniest drop of fresh lemon, an oyster will present a heady mix of clean salt and subtle sweet, followed by minerals, fruit and metals.
She received all sorts of accolades for her performance, but I thought it was horrible. She added all sorts of flourishes and vocal gymnastics that added nothing to the song; rather, she appeared to be just showing off for the sake of showing off.
As the oldest we are supposed to pave the road. We are supposed to tell our younger siblings what to do and how to do it. We aren’t supposed to watch, helpless, as our 33 year old baby brother fights to survive and loses that battle in less than 48 short hours.
Monica
In my case, that includes writing about it—every chance I get, including blogs, letters, articles, and a new fiction-based-on-real-life series that I’m just now starting. Will you pray for me as I research and write it? And will you also pray and ask God what you can do to answer His heart cry of “Let My people go”? Millions of enslaved human beings around the world are depending on you to respond.
Weeza and Phil brought fish pie for lunch, Ro brought apple strudel and cream and I provided a chocolate sponge pudding and custard, and the vegetables (carrots, cauliflower and courgettes, if you want to know) and it all went down well. I sent them home with some fairy cakes that I'd have served with tea if Al and family had come through, but they still aren't at all well and Weeza and co certainly don't want to catch their bug, so better not mingle if there's still a risk.
I sincerely hope n' pray that if I EVER begin to get bitter that you all slap me upside the head n' knock some sense back into me. I literally and figuratively mean that (so get yer seebats ready).
Hope you are having a great day!
Here is another inspiration worthy alphabet party. The awesome thing about an alphabet party, is that you can stick a letter on something and it fits the theme. Easy peasy. I'm not huge in to things being too 'themey' so this was a great one to go middle ground on.
A few other things have to be fixed but they’re not as important. I lost my way toward introducing Shatner Posey. He might have to go. I might have to murder my darling.
I thought Republicans didn't believe in squandering taxpayers' money? (No, I have never believed that either, but that is the okeydoke they put out.) So, how about an itemized list, detailing exactly where these millions of greenbacks are going, and an explanation of why THESE particular road-projects have been given precedent over others in poorer neighborhoods? Did they submit these projects to a public bidding process, to insure the cheapest bid? Who knows? GPATS works in secret... the board is composed of many elected officials, but how did they get appointed to GPATS? We counted about two dozen board-members, all white men, with one black woman and one white woman, period. (Now, who decided on THAT?) There are plenty of elected officials they could have asked to be on the GPATS who aren't white males, but perhaps they don't know any? How is one for selected for the GPATS board?
I do feel lonely though. All of my best friends are now dating people (my two who were single both have people who seem to be promising)… I have acquaintances that are single, but really, no good friends. And I was hoping to meet more people through Magnum and even that didn’t work out, since he won’t invite me along to anything, apparently.
Well, something you should remember is that we are all human beings. We all feel like this at some point, no matter how hard it is to believe. They can hide their nerves well and so if they can’t get over it, they can try their best to disguise it.
Some positive commitments I have made so far are:
It makes me very sad that Al-Jazeera TV allows an insane and terroristic creature like Al-Qaradhawi to use it as a medium for the spreading of his poisons, his terroristic fatwas, and his babbling. The words he used against me incited many young Muslims – who have been brainwashed and blindfolded, and who have been programmed to hate – to rain curses and threats upon me, right after the show in which he discussed my appearance on Al-Jazeera.
Another phone call home from a Munich train station: “Gorbachev is back in power!” came my my mom’s voice, thinned by distance and echoes, but clearly relieved. And a few days later, we boarded a train to Moscow. The well-lighted West shrank behind us, and eerie, green-gray, fishbowl images of Soviet Russia scrolled by our windows as we clattered eastward.
Well, tonight he unexpectedly got me real good. I think he knows when he can scare me and not have the carp beat out of him as opposed to, “I know better than to do it to her now”.
They come out at night, mostly… Visitors to this month’s MCM London Comic Con will enjoy an exclusive UK first playable of the Aliens: Colonial Marines multiplayer, the highly-anticipated first-person shooter from SEGA and Gearbox.
For those of you who commented on the original blog post and do not have profiles that lead back to blogs and email addresses, you need to contact me with your postal address and details of your blog or where you plan to put the review.
Heat the olive oil over medium heat in a sauce pan. Add garlic and stir. Just before the garlic starts to brown raise the heat a little and add green beans, corn and beans. Stir occasionally. When the veg begins to brown a little, add:
and admire my skeleton but I can't fit the skull through the
Here is where the recent events get murky.
The small perks are important, they make every day working more enjoyable, but it seems to me that the most effective way to retain talent is to allow your people to make their own decisions. This trust you show in them will pay dividends. That’s no reason to get rid of the free cake though…
Life is Good and sometimes Really Great,
4. Best of all- bask in the glory, have fun, and share the love!
wrong path.
80 different countries have now formed an alliance against the Old World Order / Nazi-esque cabal.
The above does not, of course, imply that two people from different cultures must fail to agree on what object or event is being attended to, though each might be puzzled by an apparent tendency in the other to include 'irrelevancies' under the one term. Eventually, of course, they will be able to compromise to the point where they will agree entirely. We can be sure this is possible because the ontological given really is there. The categorizations we apply do not in any way alter what is given.
As is often the case, many of the measures in the Budget had been released, leaked or alluded to in the days leading up to the Budget itself, so there weren’t a lot of surprises in the announcement itself.
‘According to TMZ, Wiz Khalifa has been arrested at a hotel in Nashville after another guest reported smelling pot smoke, and police found him holding 3.7 grams of marijuana.’
Hi everyone! I'm having one of those kind of weeks. Can anyone out there relate?
・ Rounded diaphragm to produce a smooth, beautiful “bokeh” (out-of-focus rendition), while minimizing the streaking effect of point light sources
After further questioning, it turned out that they really didn’t know much else, and that these “chicken balls”, as I gathered, happened to be a form of Canadian Chinese food (much like American Chinese food).
1 attracting
Ignore the video's technical issues and enjoy the images of a classic 1940s vintage popcorn machine that was used for many years in a small town movie theater by the legendary (locally, at least) "Popcorn Lady". The Artcraft Theatre still shows vintage movies (on 35mm by a real projectionist), so if you ever find yourself driving between Louisville and Indianapolis some weekend, get off the highway at exit 90 and enjoy the show.
I also woke up thinking about the illustrator Authur Rackham. I always feel that he so flawlessly captured the essence of fairy tales; the beauty and the darkness. His art can be at once breathtaking and unsettling. As a child I would study them for a very long time, feeling lost inside then and somehow challenged by thier complexity. It's funny, but only today did I realize what a huge role trees play in almost every painting. Perhaps another cause of fascination...
So there you have it, a list of early pregnancy symptoms for you to browse over and be prepared for if you’re thinking of taking the plunge into motherhood! Don’t get me wrong, you could be one of these more fortunate ladies who don’t get ANY symptoms, in which case you’re very VERY lucky!
These are shots you prob’ly did miss… haha
Goaaaaarrrrrnnnnn Stoke!
I met with some people, saw some places and none of it was right – my gut was totally not into the whole plan as much as every other part of my body was screaming at it to get into it.
Ah, the good old days!
Because of their rough texture and the grooves that are between each plank on the walls, they were sprayed and then hand painted with a brush. Dustin sprayed the walls while I went behind him with a brush. Essentially, this room had every square inch of wall space painted by hand. The walls were so rough that the sprayer distributed the paint well, but wasn’t getting it into all the nooks, crannies, and cracks. Although it was a bit more work than expected, it went fairly quickly. And, the results are fantastic.
His quick reply was “Be boring. It will end up interesting.”
To celebrate the new alcohol guidelines I’ll be having two days away from drink and then enjoying a rather large bottle of Scotch with supper on Friday.
Whatever the reason was, I was inspired with broccoli and happy to present it today.
AMAA received 328 entries from across Africa in 2012, up from 220 in 2011. Dr. Asantewa Olantunji, director of programming of The Pan African Film Festival, headed this year’s jury, which included June Giavanni, programmer for Planet Africa at The Toronto International Film Festival; Keith Shiri, founder and film curator at the London festival, Africa at The Pictures; Dorothee Wenner, a curator at The Berlin Film Festival; Shaibu Husseini, an actor, dancer and The Nigerian Guardian arts journalist; Steve Ayorinde, editor-in-chief of The Daily Mirror; Ayoko Babu, executive director of The Pan African Film Festival; Dr. Hyginus Ekwuazi, a film scholar and critic; and directors Berni Goldblat and John Akomfrah, OBE.
Five Movies You Should Watch
And I smashed that bottle hard right in his face.
I am loving the idea of a potting table. It would come in handy on the deck especially for spring planting. But at night or on the weekends I can see using it as a buffet or drink station. I can picture it decorated with candles and plants and maybe some wine or margaritas.
I felt ashamed of myself.
She and Him
The question then is not “How do extricate myself from the systems of domination?” but instead “How do I begin to organize my life with others such that our existence challenges the status quo both within ourselves and the broader culture?” It is only as members of the culture and web of domination that we pose a threat or challenge to the system. (Why are the relatively small numbers of people involved in Occupy protests across the country such a threat to the Powers that they are willing to spend inordinate amounts of money to have the police and authorities attempt to forcibly remove them?)
You’re a hard working teacher
I had a lot of fun hanging out with Braden for a week, and was a little bit sad to go back home. I was excited, however, to sleep in my own bed. After sleeping on the couch or chair, my bed felt like a cloud.
I'm afraid I'm going to be a bit of a one trick pony this week, as far as my wardrobe is concerned. My big scary exam is this Friday and as a result, every useable part of my brain is being taken up with remembering facts about things like mid-20th century architecture and the difference between Humanism and Mannerism. That, and I think I've just discovered what looks really really good on me in my wardrobe and I want to stick with it forever and ever.
- Line 2 baking sheets with parchment paper.
We headed off immediately.
“What is that?”
While the film does tell the tragic story of teenage suicides, there are upbeat moments as well. But none more transforming than Alex who is openly and continually bullied on a school bus in Sioux City.
Children targeted by bullies also tend to fit a particular profile. Bullies often choose children who are passive, easily intimidated, or have few friends. Victims may also be smaller or younger, and have a harder time defending themselves.
$145
2nd Place: FSU
our own
Suicide - Suicide
Savard: Why?
Today is a day to respond with reverence, service, civility and love. Let's return to our knees in prayer. Let's fast and pray to God for help, for guidance, for wisdom, for aide. Let's smile at one another in unity and love. Let's make the air ring with the Pledge of Allegiance, with the Star Spangled banner, with the sounds of joy.
Conditions can make you cool
Only 185 of these islands are inhabited. The Maldives has the lowest average altitude on the planet, of about 1.5 meters (3-4 ft). Scientists fear that Global Warming will lead to the disappearance of the country by 2050. The government of the Maldives has started buying land in Australia with the eventual plan of a massive migration when needed.
Think about it. Have you ever heard a eulogy that includes the phrase, "And the deceased was truly patient." Or a politician saying, "I don't want to blow my own horn but I'm a lot more patient than the other candidates."
Scheduling everything (teaching, Lubec Arts Alive, Cobscook Pottery, garden....) it's like a well-choreographed dance!
Then we repaired to a nearby watering hole to partake of the waters, easing past a badge-laden bouncer to take advantage of a lull in the evening’s jollities – until our table was removed by the bar staff, who warned us ‘it gets packed in here, just you wait...’
And here’s saving the best for the last – Thank you Lill and Jill for sharing your lives with us! You two make life a fun place to be in with all your roller coaster adventures and experiments! Discovering your site was one the best things and I think everyone should take a big slice out of your celebration of the joyous and downright funny takes on all the “moments” of each day!! You gals are the best! Thank you for all those moments of sheer sitcom joy!!
Our Easter focus point, Christ is Risen! I filled the kids baskets with great catholic books, a chocolate bunny and one toy. They were over joyed. It was simple and real to them. They honestly think that Jesus came and left those things for them. The Innocents of children!~
210H--Apple
KIDS: “Whine whine whine whine whine.“
Says Spanish words and phrases and then repeats them in English. While doing this she moves her body.
Here is the complete hop order for you, just in case!
Christian Endeavor, however, was far ahead of its time in seeing a practical application of the power of God to produce miraculous cures in our lives. To be sure, however, one cannot ignore the great contemporaneous cures effected through work by the Salvation Army as reported in Harold Begbie’s famous Twice-Born Men. The work of the Oxford Group and of the Salvation Army are not the subject of this article. But I will point out (since it might bear on Dr. Bob’s own cure and views about God as the source) that Christian Endeavor spoke glowingly of Dr. E. D. Starbuck’s cure remarks, published in his title, The Psychology of Religion; and also of the work of Professor Coe who confirmed it.
Cast on 72sts
You had no control over what happened with the coffee. How you reacted in those 5 seconds is what caused your bad day. Here is what could have and should have happened.
John 15: 5: I am the Vine, you are the branches. When you’re joined with me and I with you, the relation intimate and organic, the harvest is sure to be abundant. Separated, you can’t produce a thing. Anyone who separates from me is deadwood, gathered up and thrown on the bonfire. But if you make yourselves at home with me and my words are at home in you, you can be sure that whatever you ask will be listened to and acted upon. This is how my Father shows who he is—when you produce grapes, when you mature as my disciples.
Grab ice cube trays, jello molds, bowls or cake pans. Fill and freeze with colored water (diluted liquid watercolor or food coloring work well). You can decorate your quinzhee with pretty ice jewels. Get tricky and freeze string or ribbon into your ice and hang ice ornaments in trees.
Malcolm Gladwell, in his recent book The Outliers, writes about the importance of working at something for ten thousand hours in order to achieve mastery—or, in Amabile’s framework, expertise. He describes the circumstances that enable famous innovators—or outliers, as he calls them—to achieve their breakthroughs. But he doesn’t talk about motivation. What drove a young Bill Gates or a Steve Jobs—or more recently Mark Zuckerberg—to put in the ten thousand-plus hours that they did as young people to achieve a level of mastery? None of them had a “tiger mom”—author Amy Chua’s description of herself as a mother—who threatened and bribed them to stay up night after night learning to write computer code. What they had was passion.
One of my fellow TheatreSports players, Brett Fish Anderson, writes a fascinating blog, mostly about Christianity and relationships. I love reading Brett’s blog, even though he is the most deliberately flagrant misspeller I’ve ever met and even though (or perhaps because) his beliefs are so vastly different to mine. Heinous punctuation and theism notwithstanding, I return regularly to check in on his consistently passionate and committed views on All Things Fish.
Over the years, I've done different things to get my kids motivated to do their copywork - I used to keep separate jars with scripture verses, quotes, and poems in them. Whatever they pulled out that day, that was their copywork for the day. I also used to keep a shelve in our schoolroom with books of poetry and fables. We used to alternate days copying verses, quotes, poems, passages from literature, and their choice for each day of the week. However, some selections take more than one day to complete. Therefore, if your child is young don't expect more than they can handle in about 5-10 minutes, depending on your child.
8:00 a.m. — I have the ingredients for two recipes and I have to decide which to make today. The first set is the now-complete ingredients for the CJ’s House of the Rising Sun JPA that I was going to make last time. The other set is for Don Osborn’s Arrogant Bastard clone. Both are extract with specialty grain recipes. I am going to use dry yeast in whichever one I brew.
Scholars tell us she had herself shown like this because the "masculine" features reminded people of her power and lineage. In other words, it was a kind of political propaganda.
(but there will be some chrissy surprises too,lol)
11 Samba do urubu
...In 2008 it was Barack Obama’s policy not to engage with terrorists under any circumstances. In 2009, his administration was comfortable exchanging American prisoners for British hostages. In 2012, it has become clear it was the long-standing policy of the administration to release American-held terrorist prisoners while asking for nothing in exchange, not even an American POW.
The Word tells us that the love of money is a root of all evil. Oftentimes this is what we base our perception of greed upon. Money.
(I had a ton of cute pictures but for some reason I couldn’t upload them, so if you want to see them here is the link: beautywoome.com)
Zyrtec 24ct+ $8/2
stomping our feet on the wooden boards
Very different is the extremely mellow, may I say cheesy, Romantic Rally. The bad thing is that the track is long as well. The song also has some more funky elements, but that certainly does not help. The guitar parts cropping up here and there are not bad, but not very distinctive either. Typical seventies jazzrock. A bit of Crimson comes up at the end (21st Century Schizoid Man).
4 increase
February 17, 2012 – Friday
But since 2007 nearly 10,000 criminals were not back in jail within the target time.
Today is my super busy day - I'll be working two 8 hour shifts as our community is hosting a HUGE event and it's all hands on deck (this weekend only). That means that today's post will be SUPER short!
To simply describe the change occurring at the coming of Christ as a change from one train to another doesn’t do justice to it! It’s more like moving from a train pulled by an old steam locomotive into a sleek, modern passenger train.
Humanly speaking there was ample reason to fear for back in verse 20 we read that, “all hope that we should be saved was taken away.” But wasn’t the apostle Paul spiritually minded? We could not say he wasn’t but he was not filled with the Spirit. No one is for then he would be sinless as was the Lord Himself, totally in the hands of God. For the Lord to tell him to “fear not,” we consider the original Greek tense. It is to “stop fearing.” There was very good reason for this admonition. He was afraid. He was human. He had to be reminded that God was in control of the situation.
So all in all I wasn't on top of the world that day, and a shopping expedition sounded just the thing to take my mind off things, especially as I wasn't doing the shopping, just observing. We went to the rue de Rivoli, one of the famous roads in the centre, famous names, famously expensive. Some of it, it has to be said, is just expensive tourist tat. It runs past the Louvre and the Tuileries gardens. Its main advantage to me was that it had the English bookshop, WH Smith, many times rescuing me from certain boredom.
Many things can get in the way of those who do not get an education but it is only ourselves,who prevent ourselves from working up the ladder of success with a College degree. Your future is only limited by your lack of imagination and ambition. By your insistence to continue living the lifestyle that was provided to you by your parents, you will not ever find the level of job performance that is required unless you are given both the job and lifestyle by family members. Many a college graduate started measuring people for suits, waiting tables, flipping hamburgers,as entry-level bank or insurance employees, and at minimum wage. Many, if not all of the rest of us, learn to eat a diet of canned soup for days and in other cases to drop down to 1 meal a day. The credit card is destroyed and rent is shared by enough roommates that makes it feasible for us to enjoy a little of the college life after graduation.
MM Automatic Liner BK911
I can’t tell that story without choking up – because to me, it’s the absolute pinnacle of Olympic greatness. Maybe not in athleticism but in sportsmanship, respect, and knowing what’s really important in life. In fact, that story kind of sums up what I’ve tried to do with my 365 project: turn around in the middle of the race and go back to help somebody who fell.
This song soothes my psyche and calms my blood pressure. I especially like:
After that fun I've planning to do writing up three schemes of work. Two for completely new courses I'll be running and the other that largely depends on the individual learning needs of the students I'll get so it has to be vaguish and flexible if you know what I mean.
The ASA was concerned by Atos’ lack of response and apparent disregard for the Code, which was a breach of CAP Code (Edition 12) rule 1.7 (Unreasonable delay). We reminded them of their responsibility to respond promptly to our enquiries and told them to do so in future.
Why am I okay with this?
I am sharing this for two reason. First I am very happy for the improvement and taking a moment to pat myself on the back! I know that I need to stay committed to this lifestyle and it will take dedication for the weight to continue to drop and my numbers to be on track. So that is the second reason I post this. I am telling you so you can keep an eye on me. Support is a wonderful motivator. If I tell you where I am I know it will make me want to keep up the good work. I don't want to fail!
Making this soon ... when my girl is home :D
Mix together 2 cups powdered sugar with 2 tablespoons lemon juice and 2 teaspoons of milk.
He kissed my hand,
This isn't going to be a proper review, sorry! I just wanted to mention that I LOVE this lotion. I'm not big on lotions, but this is one I actually try to remember to use because it smells so good (like coconut & vanilla), and it feels really great too. I don't feel any lotion residue after its sunk in and my skin feels very smooth.
The issue cropped up when Barisan backbenchers deputy chief Datuk Bung Mokhtar Radin (BN-Kinabatangan) said he would continue to voice opposition against the low-cost carrier if the ministry failed to thoroughly investigate the allegations levelled against it.
-Add in the sugar and patties.Let it boil for another 5 minutes.
Armor is semi-autobiographical, layered with lots of fiction, conflict, and subtext. It was liberating once I determined not to write a memoir. For me, fictionalizing my material allows me to go deeper. A friend of mine once said, “You picked through your life and had fun with it.”
“Wait a minute, God, You’re taking away 99% of what’s important to me in life, and You expect me to laugh and shrug and be like, Oh well, my friends aren’t all that cool anyway, who cares if I have no idea when I’ll ever see them again? The joy of the Lord is my strength! Now how else do You want to torture me, God, because I’m perfectly happy to go through anything as long as the joy of the Lord is my strength! Come to think of it, this is kind of fun . . . NOT!”
"I? Heavens no. I'm blessed with more brains and opportunities than many people, but there's nothing about me that breaks out of the ordinary mold."How would you rate the book?
Notice that it’s taken as a given that the author of Genesis 1 didn’t intend to “teach in a scientific manner the detailed constitution of visible things and the complete order of creation”. It’s simply assumed that, rather, it was his intention “to give his people a popular notion, according as the common speech of the times went”. Thus, the Magisterium concludes, it’s not necessary to seek scientific details in the sacred text. As Pope Leo XIII teaches, no such details were revealed by the Holy Spirit to the sacred authors.
The main properties linked to this stone are that of personal power, abundance, prosperity and stability. Often seen as lucky with links to wealth but also the gain of personal character and confidence. Linked to the centre point of the body, strengthening, good for men and women. Citrine has been called the "stone of the mind", ancient cultures believed that placing a citrine on the forehead would increase psychic power.
JPedde I think the best way to increase engagement is making sure it’s easy to log in, easy to find you, you’re visible, easy site nav
know brown is black
So ... that's where we are with things at the moment. Hopefully I will have some more news to post tomorrow. :0)
The derision in his voice snapped me back into the moment. My shoulders dropped. I could handle being insulted by assholes in suits. I had years of experience. My friends called me Haywire. Whenever they needed someone to cause a ruckus, they called me. I was proud of it. It was more my identity than my cop family name, or my grandfather’s first name that became mine.
Blue Floral Cotton Fabric - sooo pretty! Gonna make a top from this for summer I think.
When he came into your life
So anyway, I have a long list of things I want to do with this space. One of those things is paint but to paint the entry way we have to paint nearly the entire house since it's all connected. That will happen (oh yes, it will, and all the trim too! BWAHAHA!) but not for a while. So for now, I am going to stick to organizing and accessorizing.
I don’t know what tomorrow holds
So now that I find myself in “the other camp”, I realize I have to be just as careful about stereotyping the other way. Not all atheists are bullies. In fact, I think atheists are just as different from each other than Christians are. One atheist’s ignorance certainly doesn’t define the entire group. I don’t quite know what my husband is, but if I were to label him something, it probably would be an atheists. The trick to avoid the need to stereotype is to grow within myself, I think. The more secure I become in who I am, what I’m feeling, what I’m thinking, what my beliefs are, my faith, the less I will need to put other people down. The less need I will have to argue with people who don’t agree with me. I will know what I know, and walk along my path, but if anyone else would like to join they would be more than welcome. But I won’t force anyone to walk with me.
Today I'll share three picture-taking rules/tips in regard to Layout:
This thing with the girl who tweeted about Sam Brownback, though, is a little ridiculous as a rallying point for first-amendment rights. The story, for those of you who don't know it:
New versions of No. 3 also appeared in the same period. The enigmatic No. 3a, which retained a gravity of over 1070º. No. 3 Sc (presumably meaning Scotch or Scottish) which appears to be exactly the same as the standard version. Finally No. 3 btg, the bottling version, which was a touch higher in gravity, 1070º, and the most heavily hopped at 1.75 lbs per barrel.
Take in the colours, the smells, the tastes, the sounds…..
Says Murali, the producer of Kanchana, “Even after our talks to remake the film with Salman fell through, we have been receiving a lot of offers from Bollywood producers for the remake rights. With mass movies enjoying better success there, the focus of Bollywood producers has currently shifted from multiplexes to the single screens. And they are very eager to buy content from the south.”
**click that link right there to nab a copy of that tape, but if you want one from me, I got em in the Sentient Recordings shop too.
Nobody heard our poor Mother’s screams
We also stopped at Salvation Army and Goodwill and looked around. Got Nathan a birthday present ~ a twin bed frame. He is addicted to the instructables website and he has two projects that he needs the twin bed frame for. His birthday isn't til December but I couldn't hide the frame in the car so he already knows he's getting it.
It’s impossible to say for certain if greater awareness of SUDEP by family members, and by the loved ones themselves, could have prevented some, or any, of these deaths. There’s just not enough information available yet. But what is important is that people with epilepsy understand the reality of SUDEP so that they can make their daily decisions fully aware of the risks involved.
(If only it were that easy....)
Ali wasn’t just fighting for his personal cause and rewards.
A Republican lawmaker is intensifying his push for legislation that would change how the government measures the unemployment rate.
These young people are part of the “new normal” in today’s globalizing world. Unlike those of past generations who grew up in monocultural environments, these young people meaningfully interact with two or more different cultural worlds during their developmental years.
There are seven of these, each a separate story with different characters set around one of the Seven Wonders of the Ancient World. You can read them in any order. There's a bit of gore and magic, and the historical adventure plots give these titles boy appeal - but don't dismiss them if you're a girl, since some have heroines. These books are around 60,000 words each and have fairly complex plots, so probably best for readers 10 and over who can cope with the historical settings.
In the meantime, I'm behind on cleaning the floors in this house. I have to stay in mom-mode, as I call it, and I have a duty to keep this house as clean as possible for Jack's eventual homecoming. I'm off to vacuum with my Bissell Pet Hair Eraser and Featherweight vacuums. Good times, right?
Hey, what would a Food Librarian post be without mentioning the food? Gwendolyn made a terrific lasagna. My favorite line was, "It was a vegetarian lasagna, but we added meat!" Filled with veggies and meat, they also added pine nuts (good idea Nate!) It was delicious! Shannon and Katie brought cheese, crackers and fruit. Nothing is cuter than a toddler asking for more and more blueberries and grapes.
Motion sets into our lives
- Leave the cookies to cool for 5 minutes on the trays before turning out onto a wire cooling rack to cool completely.
Lewis is Nicholas Brody, an American soldier rescued after almost ten years as a POW. Brody returns to a Hero’s welcome but CIA analyst Carrie Matheson (Claire Danes) suspects that he has been turned and his loyalties now lie with the terrorists who held him captive.
So now I was really having fun and found one more quiz to take, TheHomeStylist. This was more of a personality test along with being home styles. Very interesting to see how my personality totally nailed my design style, too. My results:
You need to say something about the after-effects of salvation – how the Lord has blessed your life.
Simply click-on the clip to your phone, then screw in the desired lens to the clip’s housing, and become a pro ‘shooter’. Circular Polarizer, 3-Image Mirage, or the classic Fisheye lens filters are available. Get clippin’ for $35 USD each.
did i tell all y'all that the MITM sent me a file of his "approved for posting" photos? yep, he did, but this is one i took of him sitting across our partner's desk!
So I've fallen behind on my homeschool posts again. But we've been doing stuff. Promise. I am ready to be done for this year, though. What was I thinking when I declared us "year round" homeschoolers. Psshh. No, I'm ready for summer break next month.
To me this is my very favourite non punk related album of all time. A double cd 28 track masterpiece. I cannot listen to one single track without listening to all 28. I just love it. I'm not saying you will as with the Pumpkins you either like or dislike - there's no inbetween with them it seems. Some of its manic,some mellow,some happy,some sad but all of it outstanding to me. I was in a very dark place when this album was released - a place I stayed for some time too due to a number of family related deaths and a relationship breakup. Major depression! This album helped me more than any person did and that's just one of the reasons I adore it. Music is my therapy. I don't need a reason to upload this album but for me this blog is not complete without this masterpiece.
In her lone dissent, Judge Mary Schroeder said, “the court’s refusal to consider claims of system-wide delays leaves millions of veterans – past, present and future – without any available redress.”
I haven't quite decided where to put it yet.
Work is about to start on improvements to the area leading to King John’s Palace and some archaeological works to the palace as part of the Ouseburn Park Heritage Lottery Bid. A suitable time, I thought, to gather together a few photos taken over the years before the area changes.
Whatever you want to write, write it the way you want to write it, write it whatever length it wants to be, and stick it up on the internet if nobody will publish it. Don’t kill it to fit it into an industrial box. Artistically, we live in a golden age of freedom, and that’s terrifying. Commercially, we live with market censorship of certain forms. It’s a pain, but it’s survivable. I’m running out of time, the deadline is here, the champagne is wearing off, so, last suggestions: try comedy instead of tragedy. Ditch realism for a bit, see what happens. Because reality isn’t realistic any more.
It's one of my absolute favorites because much of this is music that I grew up with rather than the stuff that I've come to love over the past 4 or 5 years. And towards the end of last year I was actually thinking of doing a new volume. Just as moody... just as sinister... just as uneasy. I want to do uneasy listening JUSTICE! If you trust my ear, maybe I can make it happen.
I am about a week from my 3rd trimester! I can't believe how fast this pregnancy is going. To be honest, I haven't really had time to think about being pregnant up until this point, though I'm starting to get to the uncomfortable stage where breathing becomes a luxury.
Spencer, she doesn’t care. Like, at all…
If the State grants financial compensation, this is paid from the Treasury. The third party is the landowner. He plays no part in the action but is merely an interested party. But if the landowner is affected insofar as the claimants want his land, he becomes involved in the claim and must pay his own legal costs. It is not possible for him to obtain an order for costs against one of the other parties. If the restitution claim goes to court, the court must decide in what way the claimant will be compensated, i.e., in which of the above three ways.
I am just as ordinary as ordinary people are.
And if you'd like to review please let me know which eformat you prefer
Again quoting the HHS ringmaster: “Approximately 10 million Americans need long term care services and support, ranging from having an aide visit for a few hours a week to living in a nursing home with around the clock care. As Americans age, that number will rise steadily; by 2020, the estimate is that 15 million Americans will need some kind of care…We know that one out of six people who reach the age of 65 will spend more than $100,000 on long term care.”
In my opinion, there comes a time when a president, CEO, or leader, needs to stop asking and start telling the way they would like the team to run.
We had adopted him last January when we went to rescue a dog who we fostered for 2 weeks while a rescue group I was working with found her a home. She had been my neighbor's dog across the street. The parents got a divorce and they left the dogs at the house while they tried to sell it. The woman had told me the dogs were being cared for and that she would not take them to the shelter until I had found a rescue group for them to be handed over to. Their yard was a mess and they neglected their dogs. Well, about 2 weeks later I got an email from the Shiba Inu rescue group I had contacted saying that they had found Foxy (the mom dog) and one of her puppies which was about a year old at the shelter. They emailed me a picture (they were in the Bay Area but by some stroke of luck they had volunteers who lived down south) and I confirmed that that was them. We still have no idea to this day where the other puppy is or what happened to it. I went to the abandoned house and did not hear it anymore, so I hope that it got given away but I'm worried that it died. Anyway, we were there claiming them from the shelter and my mom went into the cat room.
Bells Batch 10,000
Something to live for.
Thank goodness Benham Rise is found at the coastal region of Isabela and Aurora provinces in the East and not somewhere in the West where China’s nine-dash line lay claim to almost all of the West Philippine Sea (South China Sea).
As for the government’s involvement or investment into these holy corporations, I have not researched this yet. But obviously the political influence is there, and that should raise any honest and righteous mans brow.
12. Queen Victoria is reputed to have smoked cigarettes during her visits to the Highlands of Scotland to keep away midges.
I wanted to make this a real party card, so I used the side step card to allow room for the party hat and party balloons and give me room to print my precious elephant a little larger. I colored her with Copics and added a little Diamond Stickles to her hem and neckline. That fun shaw reminds me of these ruffly scarves that are the rage right now. The DP's are from the DCWV Nana's Kids pad. They have bright fun colors and lots of glitter already on them. The card base is SU paper and the balloons and hat were cut on my Sizzix . The Happy Birthday stamp is from Artful Legacy a local scrapbook store that is now on line. The cupcake button is from my stash. The oval shapes are from Nestabilities Labels 10.
In April, Ryan Polayya responded to an appeal from Volkswagen South Africa to take his 2007 Polo TDi Sportline to a dealership as part of the manufacturer's turbo recall.
“Listen, how about we join…”
3. Homemade cakes. In fact, I generally don't enjoy most store bought cakes. Home mades ones are made with love(why bake if you hate it) and don't contain as much sugar and conservatives.
But a sharp, bitter iron scent reaches his nostrils. He tugs the door away further and holds up a hand, reaching out to just barely touch his Mana, letting it run through his arm and up to his fingers. They glow, then, shining brightly, illuminating the interior of the house before him.
I was charged to do a Hong Kong post by another lovely blogger and so I decided it was long overdue to take my Blissful Adventurers on a tour.
Some suffer from aching muscles, others from aching joints, while others are not bothered by physical pains.
Our letter from God is the Bible. It wasn’t written in a day. He took His time writing what He knew we would need. His Word is deliberately filled with encouragement and love. It is full of wisdom meant to guide us. He included testimonies of people like us walking through the torrential storms of life He wrote about righteous men living through unforeseen and unfair circumstances. He shared the feelings and the hurt these men endured. And He wrote the stories of their redemption. Written in this book are chapters sharing joys of celebration along with sorrows of devastation. God included everything we could possibly experience in this life. He loved us enough to write it down.
**So if you are looking for some happies to make someone's day a little more special, head to Target & the Dollar Spot!**
If you want to truly enjoy NYC, then treat it like a jungle. Just walk with your eyes open. Don't be afraid to interact with strangers, and you will meet some incredible people. There are many treasure maps, both online and offline, to New York City. Use them, of course, but also cut a swath and blaze your own paths. Enjoy the adventure. Happy New Year, jungle lovers :)
*Mix well
Annabeth is an intriguing character as she helps Percy but she still hopes to get Luke back, which I am afraid she will find is impossible for Luke is not himself anymore. Luke is not the half-blood that he used to be. Kronos found the use for him and could be their downfall.
My only issue with the book is the name of the villain of the piece; Skulltaker. For those who don't play the tabletop, this is skulltaker;
Recommendation: Read (either alone or with a kid)
1. Warum bist du ins Ausland umgezogen?
1 tsp. cracked black pepper
boots-custom made
Banking and politics have always been joined a the hip. The proposed 50 billion bailout fund will strengthen that connection. Wall Street likes that part of the reform package, because the government grantee will make it easier for them to borrow money and make deals. Congress like it because the more control it has will no doubt lead to more senators like Dodd getting special treatment from banks like countrywide.
b) Through Confession of Sin to God’s minister (a priest)
A chorus of grumbling mingled in with the squeaking of chairs as more than a dozen men stood up and walked over the body of the man at the bar. They dragged him out the door tossing him into the street. The bartender barked out an order and a young girl in her teens came out of a back room with sawdust and a broom to clean up the blood on the floor.
I should be able to knock this one out pretty fast so I need some other ideas....send them my way dear blovies....
Thanks so much for designing for us today Amber! :)
To decorate for our family and how we function instead of just for looks.
Am I also to believe that my husband and I will be together, forever and ever from now on? Can I now stop looking over my shoulder for any signs of trouble and just let out this huge breath of relief? So many have gone through this but some of them falter and decided to leave each other, and some even became happier from it. I’m not saying I have doubts about our marriage and want to leave him but sometimes, when the sadness is just too much or when I get too tired of thinking about this day after day; I do feel that we should have just split up. We can possibly end up becoming even happier people and most importantly not feel threatened by any other betrayals. That would be easier wouldn’t it? It does sound like I have given up and ready to take the easy way out. Sometimes, I wonder if my husband has truly forgotten that wretched woman. My fellow blogger friend, Not Over It and I knows the importance of “loving me with all your heart”. Sigh. I guess this really all boils down to Fear. Maybe I am just protecting myself from getting seriously hurt by refusing to believe in those things anymore. The damn Affair has not only robbed me of those Fantasies but has given me a Nightmare instead.
We thus begin to fathom that the so-called “Arab Spring” of today did not just suddenly and spontaneously explode in 2011, but was rather hatched from an “egg” laid decades ago and brooded by the secret intelligence agencies.
Every word Hina said came true. She passed away peacefully after a week.
even when I'm just sitting here
From behind me. Between my knees, just underneath the hem of my skirt. Gentle, skillful. Short strokes upward. Can't be yours, the direction is all wrong. I freeze, orgasm stopped dead in its tracks, animal lust replaced by animal fear. Who the fuck is that?
I am told that righting a tipped boat is a fairly easy procedure. One person raises the mast/sail on the front of the tipped boat while another person puts his/her full weight on the daggerboard in back. The leverage makes the boat stand upright.
But really, I should know by now that there is never any shame in admitting that you need cards. This is blogging and this is collecting. Unlike that place called "work," we're all in this together. That has been demonstrated to me countless times over 3 1/2 years.
4. The Bitch once ate for tea an editor who ditto.
filling the screen.
It was convenient in some ways, but I immediately noticed a difference in how people reacted to me. In fact, I gained a degree of invisibility as a short woman with short hair, and mostly that's not a good thing when it is already a struggle to be taken seriously.
Woman, in all her broken states, is embodied in You's character tour de force, and each has her patriarchal compare. The protagonist's mother takes up with the picaresque Kit, local butcher and lad about town, and in a scene redolent of Joseph Ferdinand Geuldry's The Blood-Drinkers, he takes her a meat offering which the protagonist turns away from in revulsion. In accepting the bloody gifts, the protagonist's mother is made a prostitute in her daughter's eyes, even if the young girl does not yet know that word, and perhaps an addict in the reader's. The mother's seeming inability to direct her own course in life is a source of consternation to her daughter, yet, in the novel's pivotal scene, it is the inaction of three males which brings about what will be regarded as the books most memorable tragedy.
If you’re considering coupons, but don’t know where to start, read on. These simple explanations and stress-free strategies could kick off a lifetime of half-price egg noodles. If you do nothing else, make sure to scroll down to the GOLDEN RULE OF COUPONING, wherein I explain the practice’s most important tenet as well as the origin of the universe.
2) Comment to this blog post INCLUDING the link to where we can find your beautiful piece.
I don’t know Miro. I only recently came across his blog. So I have no idea how the words I fling will affect him. I don’t know him well enough to know what his particular ego is like and how his particular defenses are arrayed.
Just wanna be sure of the place..I make a trip to search the venue as the road name sounds familiar to me and I just want to be sure, then I found out that the place is actually a stockist of direct sales..instantly I lost my interest.
Whilst making these brownies I decided to put in nearly double the chocolate that the recipe requested.....yes, I'm a self confessed chocoholic ;)
‘Power is indeed from God, but all power is overcome in Christ!’
Last week, M came to visit for his spring break. He brought me some glorious provisions from Costco, including vanilla extract and 72 ounces of chocolate chips. He also brought me a giant ahi tuna steak. It's love.
John Joseph Fanning, 54, West Hempstead, N.Y.
I wanted to add a full lining so that I could wear this skirt in the winter with tights. Also, it's silk. I always feel like silk deserves a lining. Now Ambiance is my preferred lining fabric, but I have found that it does not wash well. I went with a polyester chiffon in order not to add bulk to the gathers. It was starched as well.
They say that if you introduce a new chicken to a flock, you should do it in the middle of the night while they are all sleeping. Then when the brood awakens, they figure that newbie has been there all along.
Nonetheless, Grandfather's wife absolutely lit up the room with love and gratitude. It made your heart bigger to see, swear.
No, I will not be tincanning every weekend. That was a rare occurrence. So on Sunday, I went back to my land routine, but there was one big difference: I now have the power of a 36x optical zoom as opposed to the 16x digital zoom I was using before.
There may be a role for comment moderation as pertains to dated posts where comments are no longer current. And it is usually here that my blogs have encountered spam. But in this instance, Google's Blogger's comment moderation feature can be tweaked to cover only comments that are submitted two or more weeks or any other specified time period after the initial posting of a column.
We had most of the felt and the card table was folded up in the garage. She drew a picture of the house she wanted to make and we started working. She drew her pattern onto the felt and cut everything herself. I made the MAIL letters for her, but she did almost everything else. She still wants to add a window and a flower box to the side. I'm so proud of her work! At first, I was thinking it would be tough for me to let go and let her create, imperfections and all. I've been really impressed with the quality of her work! I'd claim it for my own, if I wasn't so proud of her.
I just found out that I have a half brother floating out there somewhere that nobody thought was information that I should know about.
Mark's Finest Papers' Design Teams are celebrating our NEWEST STAMP RELEASE with a Blog Hop. Our very talented Design Teams have created exciting paper crafts for your inspiration. With the addition of New Design Team members to inspire you, this is going to be a really fun-packed Hop!
"But there aren't any clouds."
Already, all of us are digging our own paths, sparing no one or nothing.
And yet, in this space I seem to be inhabiting a fairytale existence which embraces me every time I cross over the threshold. I do not want this fantasy to dissipate, so I take time to absorb the magic and allow myself to feel like the kind of artist who would naturally reside here.
Have a great weekend, everybody!
A healthy diet includes a variety of foods that are low in fat (especially saturated fat), low in cholesterol, and high in fiber. Plenty of fruits and vegetables should be eaten and sodium intake should be limited.
My expectation of a handful of postcards was shattered when he instead produced a dozen scrapbooks, each one jam packed with hundreds of cards, all with their own captivating story.
Hi Mum!
The broadcast began 7pm PST and 10 p.m. here, to accommodate the Broadway stars just stepping off the stage. Due to staggered entrances, many of the seats at the International were empty for much of the ceremony.
6. New Parking Lot and curbs.
Earlier on Thursday, negotiators B D Sharma and G Hargopal had left the state capital and reached Chintalnaar, from where they moved to the jungles inside Tadhmetla. The mediators are likely to escort the IAS officer to Raipur for a medical check-up.
Any good masala film must also have great costumes, and OSO delivers in this regard. The outfits from the 70’s are thoroughly of their period and stunning in their garishness and we loved them. Shantipriya wears some beautiful clothes and the depiction of Om as an actor means we get to see him in an array of costumes. There are plenty of fight scenes too, with the best reserved for the Southern Indian film episode.
A poor man's made outta muscle and blood
In my last post, I mentioned that there were some big decisions coming up. I didn’t want to share them just yet, since things were very much up in the air. But the decision is this – the doctor is considering possibly cancelling the fifth round of chemo, provided that the tests continue to come back clean. Of course we are very excited about this possibility – and that is what it is at this point, a possibility – but to be honest it does make us a little nervous. We want to make sure that the leukemia has been beaten completely, but on the other hand we don’t want Levi to go through an additional round of chemo (which happens to be the roughest one) if it’s not necessary. We’ve dwelled on this at length, but in the end we’ve come to the realization that it will do no good to worry about this; as with every stage of Levi’s battle, it is out of our hands. So we give this decision to God, and ask that you pray that He would give immense wisdom to the doctors as they examine Levi’s case and the existing research. We will trust Him that the decision they reach will be the right one, and we will support it and do whatever it takes to get Levi through this. We long for the day when Levi’s treatments will be done, and we can place him in bed at night without counting down until the morning when his next round will begin.
The next thing to know is the aromatics (i.e. spices, herbs, different vinegars, and even sugars). The possibilities are endless, you don’t just have to use dill and white vinegar. Play around with different spices and if you are stumped think about what you are pickling and what spices and herbs you would use when cooking it for a dish. For an example butternut squash loves warm spices like cinnamon, star anise, and black pepper. Use brown sugar with the regular sugar and some apple cider vinegar; now you have a wonderful fall style pickled squash that might be served as a condiment at Thanksgiving. Just make sure that everything you use when you make a pickling liquid is brought up to a boil so that the liquid can absorb all of the flavors that you add.
Lenny’s job promoting eternal life through a narcissistic obsession with healthy living (the location of his company’s headquarters in a former synagogue highlights his alienation from his ancestral heritage) and the years separating him and Eunice also sharpen another of the novel’s themes: our yearning for unending existence and the impossibility of attaining it. Lenny’s gradual abandonment of that most persistent form of human folly adds another layer of poignancy to the story. “The fading light is us,” Lenny understands, “and we are, for a moment so brief it can’t even register on our äppärät screens, beautiful.”
Dave and I planned to take one more short trip to Maryhill State Park this week. We've been having some frost warnings this week, so I called the park to see if they had turned off the water hookups. Sure enough, they had turned them off for the season on Monday. Last year they turned them off on November 1, this year, on October 24. It all depends on the weather.
watching hap pens
Products of centuries of intermarrying between families, the questionable art of breeding human livestock has been cultivated to its extreme by different royal houses of (mostly) German descent festering over the European continent for many a century. As a result, this unholy, age-old cesspool of interbreeding gave birth to the most malicious type of human imaginable: the Saxe-Coburg-Gotha chieftain.
I also love the way that The Message translates these verses. “When you’re in over your head, I’ll be there with you. When you’re in rough waters, you will not go down. When you’re between a rock and a hard place , it won’t be a dead end — because I am God, your personal God, the Holy of Israel, your Savior.” The Message
The final touch to my basket challenge quilt was to add buttons to the centers of the flowers. I stacked two buttons for the center of each flower and the large peach colored flower also has a ring of small purple buttons. To be honest stitching on the buttons was the most problematic of the entire quilt. I don’t know how many times I would stitch them on and then find them off center so cut them off to start over. I finally decided they all looked good and called if finished.
4 spring onions, chopped
This is one of those life skills Sam learned from the Hunk. I have never been able to do this. I told the Hunk I can’t balance a spoon on my nose because of the shape of my nose but he’s not buying it. Here’s a side view of my clever guy.
The clear black night sky, filled with the brightest stars you could ever imagine. Stars so bright that you can see your face in the glowing ice covered lake.
Wiese said three armed men had hijacked this unnamed woman's car from right in front of the school, with two firing off shots in all directions to keep onlookers away -- although there were many toddlers inside the school, waiting to be fetched.
At this point I stopped taking step by step pictures. We had to move the dresser indoors because the AC people needed the garage, and I was just so ready to get this thing DONE! We painted three coats of polycrilic on the top of the dresser and the drawer faces, and everywhere else got two coats. I sanded with 220 grit sandpaper inbetween each coat.
The rest of the cast is freakin’ great too, considering that just about every big star this flick had to show is in here for about 5-10 minutes each but totally kick-ass for the time they have. Dennis Hopper is great here as Clarence’s dad, in a non-psychotic role; Val Kilmer is here as “The King” but is still funny and cool, considering we barely see him; Gary Oldman is hilarious and menacing as Drexl, the white boy pimp with dreadlocks; Brad Pitt is also here as our pot-smoking friend, Floyd, and probably one of the best performances of his career, and I am willing to go toe-to-toe with whoever thinks otherwise; and Christopher Walken shows up for about 7 minutes but gives the film’s best scene where its just him and Hopper talking shit to one another and once again, it’s always Walken who steals the show at the end of the day and I can’t say that I expected anything else. Aside from these peeps I already mentioned there are plenty of other familiar faces here such as Samuel L. Jackson, James Gandolfini, Michael Rapaport, and Bronson Pinchot among others. Basically, it’s one of the better casts for a flick that I’ve seen and they all do excellent jobs with what they are given.
Candles are OK, but they don't get the job done and I am always afraid one of the evil cats will knock them over in a bid for freedom to escape their fur less monkey oppressors.
Reckoned that he’d learn himself a trade maybe see the world
Clients are forever hyping social responsibility. Coke brags about concern for children. P&G unveiled its sustainability supplier manifesto. The list goes on. Clients also consistently recognize and salute minorities with targeted programs, as well as patronizing messages during events like Black History Month, Hispanic Heritage Month, Asian Pacific American Heritage Month, etc. And of course, clients promote internal diversity and supplier diversity via contrived ads that only seem to run in minority publications. Yet they don’t see the contradictions and hypocrisy of conspiring with advertising agencies where exclusivity reigns.
I had the chance to try it out this past weekend and I made a few scrapbooking layouts from our trip to Wrightsville Beach. Here's one:
This usually happens within 24-48 hours (sometimes as long as 3 days approx) for the severe weather to manifest at hit each epicenter.
Celia Graves was once an ordinary human, but those days are long gone. Now she strives to maintain her sanity and her soul while juggling both vampire abilities and the powers of a Siren.
The blogging hiatus has ceased. Jenny and I have combined efforts and started a new blog. Visit www.SullivanWims.blogspot.com for future updates.
This was perhaps the greatest realization of my exploration: it is so easy to form opinions, but based on what? How much knowledge and information–what kind of information?—prepare us to understand another people, another culture? Having lived in three different continents for significant periods of time, including 27 years in the US, I can honestly say I often feel out of touch, whether in the US or in Portugal. In the US, because I arrived here an adult, and missed out on the cultural molding that takes place in the formative years. In Portugal, because I broke my links with the culture and now live in the past. As my own closest family lets me know every summer when I visit, I am like an echo from a lost world: with idiomatic expressions no one has heard in almost three decades; with long-dead assumptions about common values, etc.
ABV: 8.3%
The Avengers is exactly the triumphant masterpiece crown jewel that Marvel and the fans were hoping for. It is the movie that could have been, but so rarely is. A brilliant achievement, utilizing the full scope and all the strengths of the genre. And, if we are lucky - Joss Whedon's ticket to a well funded TV show that won't get cancelled!
Me: Fine. We'll skip it.
I expect he will complain when another housing estate is built behind him.
This week’s edition of “Wanderlust Wednesday” I wanted to share some photos that keep me day-dreaming about traveling. I don’t know about you guys, but I need motivation a lot of times to remind me what my hard work is going to be used on. I have a full time job, am a full time student, and my mom and I have a crafting “business” on the side… It’s a lot going on! However, when I see these pictures around my apartment, taped to the inside of my notebook for school, in my purse, and even stashed in the sun-visor of my car, I remember I have to get through the boring to get to the exciting parts of life. So I’m going to share three of my own photos from past trips and three photos from trips I’m dying to go on!
Year Built: Third Version 1965
The Appellate Division’s Kaur decision only affirms the need for reform. The decision noted a pattern of bad faith.
I want to wake up in the morning and think about the things that make me happy, not make a mental list of things that are really not so great; or worse, things that just plain suck.
James Hunt’s first win in his world title-winning season. However, this is another contentious race because the stewards at Jarama disqualify James’s M23 for being too wide. McLaren appeal the decision and he is reinstated when it’s proved that the extra width is due to tyre expansion.
Resting between my breasts
We explored habitats again today, revisiting the subject, but including the littler ones. I have lots of photocopiable workbooks upstairs, so I printed out some related worksheets and away we went. We also managed to fit in some Math Mosaics and some Arithmetic Adventures, maths, but still fun!
I am a sucker for movies based on true life stories and The Intouchables makes it to my list of 2012 must-see movies.
Novello's introduction is calculated to generate suspicion: he appears framed in a doorway, wrapped in a trenchcoat and scarf, his wide eyes glaring above his hidden nose and mouth. It's an introduction worthy of Nosferatu, and he briefly seems like a supernatural being, gliding into the boarding house, bringing with him the foggy air and the threat of murder. Soon, he starts behaving in less supernatural but equally suspicious ways, carrying around a suspicious bag and asking his new landlords to take down all the paintings in his room. Hitchcock stages several scenes that hint at the new lodger's sinister intentions towards Daisy — gesturing at her with a knife and a fire poker — but turn out to be utterly innocuous.
I am still happy to have one less thing to worry about. Being able to do things without being in pain is a good thing. If only the rest of my troubles could be fixed I’d be in great shape.
**********************Thank you, Mother.
Update: 4PM... Daisy is spending the night at the emergency vet.. the same vet that took care of Max during his long illness. The veterinary cardiologist was not in today and could not see her until Monday, but the internal medicine doctors at the emergency place could do the echocardiogram and the lab tests needed. Her heart is really large.. but there doesn't seem to be any pneumonia, tumors in the lungs or elsewhere and it doesn't look like a slam dunk on Cushings with a pulmonary thrombosis either. Her oxygen level was really low so they put her in an oxygen crate and this had helped her breathing already, before I left. She has a cardiomyopathy type of heart failure, no tumor in the heart and no pericardial fluid. Her heart muscle looks to still be functioning fairly well and they think that with some Lasix and another drug, similar to digoxin but less toxic, she might make it over this episode. Cockers tend to respond well and have a pretty good prognosis... perhaps even two to three more years of quality. The medication starts to work in thirty minutes after dosage and I will call in later to check on her. Hopefully, she will be improved and able to be out of the oxygen by sometime tomorrow and can come home.
Today, I choose hope. I choose to believe that what I wish for will come to pass because my God wants the best for me, wants me to have the desires of my heart, and wants me to be a more hopeful woman. And I choose to embrace the knowledge that if I don’t get what I want, then “it” is not right for me and I must wait and hope a little longer.
D Train ~ Music ~ Prelude ~ 1982
The reliability of the scale was .90 (Cronbach's, 1951, coefficient 'alpha'). This indicates a high degree of consistency in response on the part of these subjects. The fact that the item means oscillate on either side of the midpoint (2) indicates that a good spread of responses was obtained. Some subjects fairly consistently opted for what was 'right' while others fairly consistently opted for self-interest.
A Dystopian novel written in the 50s – how funky is that?! We have got nuclear bombs being dropped all over the place and the world is dying slowly from nuclear radiation.
On arrival at Quepos we found a taxi and gave the driver directions to our accommodation which, unbelievably, is in Londres.
- Maybe she’s a pick pocket?
Just in case three days have passed and nothing happened, I might as well just say this.
A death rattle
My garden is a year round ongoing venture. Some ideals are just seedlings, while others are fully ripe and ready to harvest. I’ve been neglecting my garden lately, and it’s bursting with ripe fruit.
I hope everyone's week is going well! We are finally having some great weather here and it does much to improve ones mood, I will say. It's supposed to be in the 80's on Friday, Yay!!!
I believe in universities. I do. (It would be nice if American society in general, or at least the state higher education board, believed in them with the same fervor, but tonight I am just glad that I have a job I believe in.)
I've mostly chosen from among my new buds, because I'd like to take this opportunity to get to know you a little better. But if this is not your kind of thing and you'd rather not, I will understand. I will not hunt you down and embarrass you ... promise.
Those many, many years ago….
5 minute AMRAP of:
When I got the book ( borrowed from my cousin in exchange for the Last Moghul), I was wondering what the book would be about. It was about 9 lives - or people that was clear. But what was not clear was how it would be played out.
But it's to no avail; I don't want the bail
But how can I do that
1 Cup Cooked Orzo
The visit is scheduled for just two days after we move in, so it will be a little crazy, but I am more than ready for it to happen! One week and six days…
- going to one of the few McDonald’s here with a coupon for two free meals that we got after Sports Day. For my free meal I asked for the beer, just for the novelty of having a beer with my Quarter Pounder.
It’s not a huge change, but the new color on the wall definitely updates it and makes the space look a lot less cold. The old color was a very faint gray in a super cheap flat paint. The new color on the walls is Behr’s Graceful Gray and the print on the wall is from an Etsy shop called Papermoth.
“I could not have had that generator away, as I was nicking a load of sewer pipes and fittings at the time, me lord.”
For those whom I'm friends with on Facebook, the below pictures you've already seen!!! Sorry for the photo bomb but I can't stop taking pictures of this little man!!!
Preheat your oven to 190*C/375*F/ gas mark 5. Line a baking tray with parchment paper. Spritz lightly with cooking spray. Set aside.
# Tent city urbanism (and what comes after) is a far cry from the spectacular models of Constant's New Babylon or the magico-marxist rereading of the Hawksmoor churches and Canary Wharf. In that the psychogeography of the recent past has fallen for the spectacle of the 'legacy'. My first impression of the Occupy camp was that it was paltry, a dynamo of underwhelming sadness, a place of insignificant littleness, but I soon realized my initial response was a form of conditioning that must be exorcised with a pickaxe. I was looking for a hacienda, baroque optical illusions and empty spaces creating richly filled time and I saw..... battered tents against
— There’s two rounds. In one of them you must defend them against the enemy, in the other one you must destroy them and the enemy defends them.
Format: CD, Limited Edition
While most guys prefer dark coloured shirts, the ideal hues for spring and summer seasons are light pastel shades. White shirts, as always, never go out of style. Guys should make sure the colour flatters and brightens their skin tone. Their outfit should bring out their best features. Another challenge in men's fashion is prints and patterns. When matched with the right tops or pants, prints can create a fresh look. This task, however, can be tricky so most guys prefer solid colours instead. Striped shirts and crew neck shirts are popular choices because they are comfortable and go well with denim jeans or shorts.
Yellow Tea: 70 to 75 ｰC (158 to 167 ｰF) 1–2 minutes, 3 infusions
He had a BUBBLE in his throat!
In my second post I said that: “two things in my opinion drive a blog: Content and Visibility.” But what I failed to address was the relationship between the two. Part of maintaining blog visibility is creating new content. Subscribers do not come visit unless they get a notice that there is a new post. New posts attract new readers. New readers are unlikely to subscribe to an infrequently updated blog. So, moral of last week: stick to your schedule!
Jackie
Turn in the door once and turn once only
Then we headed out for our excursion, we took a dune buggy through some muddy, dusty trails and then went swimming in a cave…with bats! Yikes!
Here is a current shot 1245am CDT 10/28/2011 — roughly 24 hours after the ring appeared: instead of sunny and clear like the weather pros forecasted — we see storms coming on RADAR now:
In the Wyeth moment above, there are deep complex emotions at play: the feeling of defiance, the sense that these people have made a hard choice and are going to make a statement to their tormentors that they are not afraid and they are not going to surrender (I know you can't really get all that from the illustration - you need to read the book to get the proper context).
I read somewhere that a serious writer should write everyday. I do write everyday, but not on my story. I write different kinds of diaries, and in different languages. And some days, I write only a little.
During the Rwandan genocide in 1994, the infamous Radio-Télévision des Milles Collines broadcast a call to arms to its Hutu listeners by saying "cut down the tall trees" and "kill the cockroaches".
After that there were the messages. In Japan, if you can't attend an important event, you send a message. A sample of the messages is read at the event. Apart from the sample, the names of all the people who send messages are also read.
I'm pretty sure I have my major plot line figured out. I'm changing genres on this one and look forward to the challenge that will bring. My plot line involves normal people finding themselves in a 'magical' place. But it's not a 'magic' book, nor a 'magic' story. Well..... kind of.
pretend to know what you don’t.
As such, be sure to keep your lawn mowed and bushes trimmed. Repair any broken door bells/light fixtures and put toys away. Since the front door is a focal point, give it a fresh coat of paint and/or power wash the house & sweep away any debris. Add landscape lighting to accentuate the beauty of your house and make the entranceway look inviting by placing flowers in oversized decorative pots.
Look forward to hearing from you all!
Has this ever happened to you? With what books? And what was it that caught you? __________________
The building is open to the public even when there are no performances taking place. Visitors can see rehearsals, soundchecks and workshops in progress. It has five bars, a brasserie, the "Sir Michael Straker Café", and "The Barbour Room" – a multi-purpose function room which holds around 200 people. There is also "ExploreMusic": a technologically well-equipped musical branch of Gateshead public library, stocking books, and current magazines covering all aspects of music, a CD library with listening posts, and computers with free internet access, subscriptions to music websites, and music software.
The Thing it was:
And lastly, along with so many others, especially bloggers, I am currently working on my own WIP (Contemporary). Any Advice you'd like to share?
12.The Same Guy
I definitely frequent Target for my kids' basics like turtlenecks and tees. I absolutely love HomeGoods for picking up cool, affordable accessories for my home.
“When you actually look at Detroit’s history, you see the blueprint for the demise of America,” says Paul Kersey.
21. Classic Clothing: Wearing Outfits You Already Have
So when I left Illinois after losing my home (no work for 2 years)my younger brother asked me to move to Virginia. Give it a try he said, so I did. Watching my brother get drunk on a daily basis isn't my way of having fun, he does it because he is bored. I could not be this way, it isn't me.
“This is the first time for us, but we’ve volunteered before when others coordinated (the WOU Pow Wow),” said Carrillo, a sophomore.
Let that perfectly ripe pear sit out on your counter for a few more days, and….well, you’ll have a mess.
This is a collection of photos all taken in the Philippines, which I will keep updating. A collection of photos of different places, structures, mountains, sunsets, sunrises, beaches and other such views that show why it’s more fun in the Philippines.
On two others, I transfered the images onto the envelopes using acrylic paint. The acrylic paint transfer is really easy, if a bit tedious, to do. All you need is a print out (on regular printer/copier paper) of a photo, some acrylic paint, some water, and some patience.
I touched her lips; she kissed my fingertips.
...this time, it's only a twenty-minute drive away...(maybe a forty-five minute bike ride, if I could figure a route that wouldn’t likely leave me sprawled out on the blacktop with alignment off in ways all the king’s yoga teachers might never put back together)...with a great teacher I’ve known a few years, and at least one fellow student I know...who's an advanced teacher, too, actually....raising suspicions I could be one of the more unlearned persons in the room...the Cletus the Slack-Jawed Yokel of yoga...Cletus the Slack-Jawed Yogi...sittin' on my mat muttering downward facin’ dawg?! whut th’ heck’s that?!....I'm looking forward to it...
I don’t know about you, but I’m obsessed with subway photography, I find it of an immense beauty!
Little is known of the early history of the site. Some Roman stones have been found there, but there is no definite evidence that it was occupied by the Romans. The Priory was founded early in the 7th century, perhaps by Edwin of Northumbria.
Original Air Date: Apr 5, 2012
Dealing with heartbreak and dealing with blood,
-a protective plate guard
Time for a Sophie update as so many of you left well wishes, messages of encouragement and were eager to hear how things developed following our stay in hospital a few weeks back. Today she is three months old and we have been seeing a big improvement lately.
The fact that as a society we grow up addressing Hindu men differently from we address Muslim men is a reality of social division. There is no getting around that fact. And that’s not necessarily problematic.
More babies means greater demand for good old-fashioned cash-value life insurance. Young couples tend to buy life insurance to protect their families and babies are making a comeback.
I should mention that there is no other number provided in any Mobily literature anywhere except the 1100 number. And if you wait 45 minutes to see a Mobily rep at one of the offices and complain about having to drive all the way there, they'll just cheerfully refer you to 1100.
to a poor 6 posts. A special one for the weekend I'd say.
“Guilty! says the world condemning the “other man”…
As an adult, I've been writing and publishing since my early twenties. I earned my MFA in creative writing in my late twenties, and writing and teaching others to write have been at the center of my life ever since then. If you are someone who shares this passion for the written word, I hope you'll keep coming to visit me in the coming months. On Fridays I'll be offering a writing exercise, tip, or bit of inspiration. All of these exercises are ones I use myself or ones that I have used over the years to help students hone their skills and develop their craft. If you feel like you want to improve your writing or that you just want to feel more inspired, try some of these exercises and tips for yourself.
When I then asked if the newly formed Clinical Commissioning Group – which now has the crucial role of deciding our primary health services – would consider reporting to the Members on my Committee directly, I was advised they already report to a sub-group of the Council which the Head of Housing attends.
Because Jennifer is not just eccentric. To Sam, she seems downright crazy. She has terrifying hallucinations involving demons, the devil, and death. And here’s the really crazy part: Sam is beginning to suspect that these visions may actually be prophecies—prophecies of something terrible that’s going to happen very soon. Unless he can stop it.
When apple picking one fall, I was looking through the gift shop and could not believe that on the shelf among the pretty packaged jars of jams and jellies sat sour cherry! I immediately bought 2 and surprised my father with his cookie. The first year I made them they were ok...the flavor was there but the size and shape of the cookie was not quite right. The following year, I hit the jackpot and my dad has requested them ever since. When sharing a tin with his cousin, they are both brought back to the days of being young boys and the magic that happened in that Italian kitchen.
This person is someone I value so much, who has always given me kindness and support and opportunity, so I feel ashamed of myself and lost as to why I would be like this. I can't think of an adequate reason. It was just hurtful. I did it. And there really isn't an excuse.
“Judges rely on what rights attorneys tell them their clients are afforded under the law,” Solomon said. “If there’s no attorney on the other side to argue that it’s wrong, the judge most often takes the word of the attorney and grants the motion. Plus, these judges hearing these cases usually are not experts in real estate law.”
A smart, sexy novel about a woman's search for her former self on the London stage Georgie and Peter, very much in love, move to London with their three children. Once there, Georgie's dormant acting career takes off and she wins the role of Dora Jordan in a one-woman show. Dora Jordan was the most famous comic actress of the eighteenth century (she had thirteen illegitimate children, including ten by the future king of England). As Georgie rehearses for her part, she becomes increasingly drawn to Dora Jordan, who she sees as a working mother with struggles exactly like her own. And when Georgie can no longer fight her attraction to the playwright, she begins an affair with tragic results. Narrated by Peter, a failed-writer-turned-businessman, My Wife's Affair is about infidelity, passion, duty, and about finally getting what you want and then wanting still more.
Dodd’s characters and plot development are fantastic. You follow along in the plot hoping one thing happens, that something will be explained but Dodd keeps you on your toes. Caitlin and Teague were fantastic together and I loved the villain. He was someone you wanted to hate and could very easily.
677 D-VIII/27/1974. “On Greece Today” (with George Anagnostopoulos and Ernest Vardalas). Studs Terkel Program, WFMT-Radio, Chicago, Illinois.
When we get closer to summer I will share my must haves for wavy, curly hair. I have a feeling with a new baby, my hair is going to be that way much more. :)
Someday a book of poems may open in your hands
I have found myself going in a direction that I was not expecting for a long time, if ever. But suddenly I found myself here and so very happy to know I am going in the right direction even though I cannot see where I will end up, yet. I am trusting that I will get there and end up exactly where I need to be.
Grossman, Lev and Joss Whedon, “The Hero Whisperer: Hollywood’s iconoclast takes on The Avengers.”Time Magazine. Vol., 178. Issue no. 18. May,7 2012
Needless to say, I couldn’t be more pumped about my 2012 season!!! I’m also officially registered for all my races for the season as well!!!! Its a little different than the tentative list I posted awhile back, so my next post will be about my race schedule and my goals!!! After that, I’ll explain how I’ve been putting my training plan together!!!
Well the bedroom is done and it has stopped raining so I suppose I better go out for a run as I won't be able to over the next few days as I will spend a lot of time on the train or having fun with my parents (its a flying solo visit). As I have just reached 4 miles I don't want to lose momentum. Tempting though!
Once on my way again, I felt stupid to be that distrusting, but the world has kind of pointed us in that direction these days and it’s not like you never hear about people disappearing or getting hurt in just such a situation.
Cover and refrigerate until very cold.
Judging from Arsenal’s recent injury woes, I regarded sending a player of Arshavin’s quality out on loan was a poor piece of judging from Arsene Wenger. However, he hasn’t been missed because his exit paved the way for the Isreali Rabbi, Yossi Benayoun, that has been a phenom in recent weeks.
Not that I’m here to talk about Fear Itself, or even comics – this is all just my way of thinking out loud, as well as providing a spoiler buffer for those who might find the link via a source that includes a portion of the post’s text. Which means it is time for the awkward segue into a post I hadn’t planned on writing; however, with Bioware’s Dr. Ray Muzyka posting a statement about Mass Effect 3 and the way people have been responding to its ending, I decided to set aside all the reasons which had made me not write this, and write it anyway.
I had the most fantastic meal last night! I couldn't have asked for a better birthday dinner. It was amazing!
Did whatever I could to survive,
It became the journey of the French Revolution in the eye of the micro-gravity
The Lopezes have been so busy these past months--so much of which I would ordinarily post on here, but haven't...I'd like to blame the Gemini for that fail as well. We had a fantastic ski trip with our friends in March and we had an entire kickball season where we had our best season yet! My stepson ran a track meet this month and graduated into middle school! My daughter got numerous awards at her assembly and was promoted to the fourth grade.
A couple months ago, I scheduled a personal reading with a local psychic and medium. He came highly recommended by a friend of a friend, and after much research on him through Google, I threw down the hundred bucks on my credit card and made a note in my calendar. I thought it'd be entertaining to hear what this person had to say about where my life was headed - or if I was even headed in the right direction.
“Keith.”
Business people are always trying to stay ahead of the curve to ride a wave to profit. Peter Gloor explores this process in Coolfarming: Turn Your Great Idea into the Next Big Thing ($29.95, Amacom). Instead of chasing after ideas that have already happened, the author provides entrepreneurs and business people with a practical, step-by-step process that will help them cultivate the kind of “swarm creativity” that generates not new trends and then how to push them over the tipping point to commercial success. Gloor has written two previous books as an “innovation expert” so one assumes he knows what he’s talking about based on a twenty-year career working with some top financial companies. These days he divides his time between the MIT Sloan School of Management, Helsinki’s Aalto University, and the University of Cologne. There is no end to books about management, but that is because it keeps changing with each new generation and new technologies. Management? It’s Not What You Think! Says Henry Mintzberg, Bruce Ahlstrand, and Joseph Lempel ($22.95, Amacom) and what these three don’t know about the subject is probably not worth knowing. Mintzberg is an esteemed McGill University scholar that the Wall Street Journal ranks as one of the world’s top ten most influential business thinkers. Ahlstrand is a professor of management at Trent University, Ontario, and Lampel is a professor of strategy at Cass Business School, City University, London. Put them together between two covers and you have a world of knowledge regarding the subject of business management. It is unconventional, provocative, and an exceptionally sensible collection of articles, commentaries, poems, blog bits, rants, and more! This book goes way beyond the standards advice on analyzing and planning.
Lucinda Williams and Spoon. Yes I know they have good songs on the radio, but they will disappoint.
o Arizona Board of Technical Registration
_____I don't always drink beer. But when I do, I always lie about not always drinking beer. (funny beer quote)
Life is a surprisingly short things
Tell us about some of your favorite personal touches at the wedding ...
